10-K 1 ueec_10k.htm FORM 10-K
 
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
Washington, D.C. 20549
 
FORM 10-K
 
☒ ANNUAL REPORT PURSUANT TO SECTION 13 OR 15(D) OF THE SECURITIES EXCHANGE ACT OF 1934
 
FOR THE FISCAL YEAR ENDED DECEMBER 31, 2020
 
COMMISSION FILE NUMBER: 000-27781
 
UNITED HEALTH PRODUCTS, INC.
(Exact name of Registrant as speciﬁed in its charter)
 
Nevada   84-1517723
(State of jurisdiction of
incorporation or organization) (I.R.S. Employee
Identiﬁcation Number)
     
10624 S. Eastern Avenue, Ste. A209
Henderson, NV 89052
(Address of principal executive oﬃces)  (Zip Code)
 
Registrant’s telephone number, including area code: (877) 358-3444
 
Securities registered pursuant to Section 12 (b) of the Act: None
 
Securities registered pursuant to Section 12 (g) of the Act: Common Stock, $.001 Par Value
 
Indicate by check mark if the registrant is a well-known seasoned issuer, as deﬁned in Rule 405 of the
Securities Act. Yes ☐     No ☒
 
Check whether the Registrant is not required to ﬁle reports pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Exchange Act.
☐
 
Indicate by check mark whether the Registrant (1) has ﬁled all reports required to be ﬁled by Section 13 or 15(d)
of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 during the preceding 12 months (or for such shorter period that the
Registrant was required to ﬁle such reports) and (2) has been subject to such ﬁling requirements for the past 90
days. Yes ☒     No ☐
 
Indicate by check mark whether the Registrant has submitted electronically every Interactive data ﬁle required
to be submitted pursuant to Rule 405 of Regulation S-T (§232.405 of this chapter) during the preceding 12
months (or for such shorter period that the registrant was required to submit such ﬁles). Yes ☒     No ☐
 
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant has ﬁled a report on and attestation to its management’s
assessment of the eﬀectiveness of its internal control over ﬁnancial reporting under Section 404(b) of the
Sarbanes-Oxley Act (15 U.S.C. 7262(b)) by the registered public accounting ﬁrm that prepared or issued its
audit report. ☒
 
Indicate by check mark if disclosure of delinquent ﬁlers in response to Item 405 of Regulation S-K is not
contained in this form, and no disclosure will be contained, to the best of Registrant’s knowledge, in deﬁnitive
proxy or information statements incorporated by reference in part III of this Form 10-K or any amendment to
this Form 10 K ☒. 
 
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant is a large accelerated ﬁler, an accelerated ﬁler, a non-
accelerated ﬁler, a smaller reporting company, or an emerging growth company. See the deﬁnitions of “large
accelerated ﬁler,” “accelerated ﬁler,” “smaller reporting company” and “emerging growth company” in Rule
12b-2 of the Exchange Act.
 
Large accelerated ﬁler ☐ Accelerated ﬁler ☐
Non-accelerated ﬁler ☒ Smaller reporting company☒
    Emerging growth company☐
 
If an emerging growth company, indicate by check mark if the registrant has elected not to use the extended
transition period for complying with any new or revised ﬁnancial accounting standards provided pursuant to
Section 13(a) of the Exchange Act. Yes ☐     No ☐
 
Indicate by check mark whether the Registrant is a shell company (as deﬁned in Rule 12b-2 of the Exchange
Act). Yes ☐     No ☒
 
As of June 30, 2020, the number of shares held by non-aﬃliates was approximately 178,348,456 shares. The
approximate market value based on the last sale (i.e. $0.72 per share as of June 30, 2020, the last business day
of the second quarter) of the Company’s Common Stock was approximately $128,410,888.
 
The number of shares issued and outstanding of the Registrant’s Common Stock, as of March 24, 2021 was
224,000,265.
   
 
 
 
Forward-looking Statements
 
Statements in this annual report on Form 10-K that are not historical facts constitute forward-looking
statements which are made pursuant to the safe harbor provisions of Section 21E of the Securities Exchange
Act of 1934, or the Exchange Act. These statements relate to future events or our future ﬁnancial performance
and involve known and unknown risks, uncertainties and other factors that may cause our or our industry’s
actual results, levels of activity, performance or achievements to be materially diﬀerent from any future
results, levels of activity, performance or achievements expressed or implied by these forward-looking
statements. Those factors include, among other things, those listed under “Risk Factors” and elsewhere in this
annual report. In some cases, you can identify forward-looking statements by terminology such as “may,”
“will,” “should,” “expects,” “plans,” “anticipates,” “believes,” “estimates,” “predicts,” “potential” or
“continue” or the negative of these terms or other comparable terminology. These statements are only
predictions. Actual events or results may diﬀer materially. Moreover, neither we nor any other person assumes
responsibility.
 
 
2
 
 
PART I
 
ITEM 1. BUSINESS
 
Company Overview
 
United Health Products, Inc. (“UHP” or the “Company”) develops, manufactures, and markets a patented
hemostatic gauze for the healthcare and wound care sectors. Our gauze product, HemoStyp®, is a neutralized,
oxidized, regenerated cellulose (“NORC”) derived from cotton and designed to absorb exudate/drainage from
superﬁcial wounds and help control bleeding. We are in the process of seeking regulatory approval to sell our
Hemostyp product line into the U.S. Class III surgical market.
 
Recent Developments
 
The following developments in the Company’s business have occurred during 2020:
 
 •The London based Journal of Wound Care published a peer-reviewed article, Eﬃcacy and Safety of
HemoStyp as an Adjunct for Management of Secondary Hemostasis in the Operative Setting, in its
November 2020 edition. The article highlights the results of the human trial demonstrating
HemoStyp’s superiority to Surgicel® Original, the current mechanical hemostat standard of care
produced by Johnson & Johnson’s Ethicon division.
   
 •On January 21, 2021, the U.S. Patent Oﬃce provided notiﬁcation of publication of the Company’s
patent application for the method of forming and using a hemostatic hydrocolloid. This publication
does not imply any assurance of the receipt of the patent but establishes an obligation of any party
that seeks to use the applicable method to pay royalties for the right to do so. The patent application
for this process remains pending as of the date of this ﬁling.
   
 •On February 11, 2021, the Company was notiﬁed that its application to establish global patent
protection for the process of creating and deploying a hydrocolloid (or gel) format of its previously
patented HemoStyp hemostatic gauze was accepted for publication under the procedures of the Patent
Cooperation Treaty (“PCT”), which is an international patent law treaty which provides a uniﬁed
procedure for ﬁling a patent application in most foreign countries. The Company previously ﬁled
provisional patent applications for its HemoStyp gauze and the hydrocolloid process in July 2019 and
2020, respectively. The Company now has up to one year to register speciﬁc patents in those countries
where it wishes to commercialize any future HemoStyp gel formats and will do so as its gel-related
R&D activity progresses through 2021.
   
  •On March 3, 2021 we participated in a discussion with the Food & Drug Administration (“FDA”)
regarding our Premarket Approval (“PMA”) application, wherein the FDA requested supplemental
information relating to our manufacturing procedures, including quality control related documentation.
The FDA also commented that the form and content of our clinical and non-clinical data has been
evaluated and were satisfactory for them to complete their review process once our application
was ﬁnalized. We are collecting the requested information and incorporating these materials into our
PMA application and will to resubmit to the FDA once completed. There can be no assurance that our
application, once revised and resubmitted, will lead to a successful FDA decision regarding a PMA.
 
Our HemoStyp Gauze Products
 
HemoStyp hemostatic gauze is a collagen-like natural substance created from chemically treated
cellulose derived from cotton. It is an eﬀective hemostatic agent registered with the FDA for superﬁcial use
under a 510k approval obtained in 2012 to help control bleeding from open wounds and body cavities. The
HemoStyp hemostatic material contains no chemical additives, thrombin or collagen, and is hypoallergenic.
When the product comes in contact with blood it expands slightly and quickly converts to a gel that
subsequently breaks down into glucose and salts. Because of its benign impact on body tissue and the fact that
it degrades to non-toxic end products, HemoStyp does not impede the healing of body tissue as do certain
competing hemostatic products. Laboratory testing has shown HemoStyp to be 100% absorbable in the human
body in 24 hours or less compared to days or weeks with competing organic regenerated cellulose products. A
human trial conducted in 2019 and 2020 demonstrated the eﬀectiveness of HemoStyp in vascular, thoracic and
abdominal surgical procedures.
 
HemoStyp hemostatic gauze is a ﬂexible, silk-like material that is applied by placing the gauze onto the
bleeding tissue. The supple material can be easily folded and manipulated as needed to ﬁt the size of the
wound or incision. In surface bleeding and surgical situations, the product quickly converts to a translucent gel
that allows the physician or surgeon to monitor the coagulation process. The gel maintains a neutral pH level
which avoids damaging the surrounding tissue. In superﬁcial bleeding situations, HemoStyp can be bonded to
an adhesive plastic bandage or integrated into a traditional gauze component to address a broad range of
needs, including traumatic bleeding injuries and prolonged bleeding following hemodialysis.
 
 
3
 
 
Potential Target Markets
 
Our HemoStyp material is currently cut to several sizes and conﬁguration and marketed as HemoStyp Gauze.
While we have paused our commercial activities to focus on our Class III PMA application, our potential
customer base includes, without limitation, the following:
 
 •Hospitals and Surgery Centers for all Internal Surgical usage (in the event we obtain FDA Class III
approval)
 •Hospitals, Clinics and Physicians for external trauma
 •EMS, Fire Departments and other First Responders
 •Military Medical Care Providers
 •Hemodialysis centers
 •Nursing Homes and Assisted Living Facilities
 •Dental and Oral & Maxillofacial Surgery Oﬃces
 •Veterinary hospitals
 
Primary Strategy
 
Or HemoStyp technology received an FDA 510k approval in 2012 for use in external or superﬁcial
bleeding situations and we believe there is an opportunity for HemoStyp products to address unmet needs in
several medical applications that represent attractive commercial opportunities. However, the Class III surgical
markets, both domestic and international, represent the most attractive market for our products due to the
smaller number of competitors oﬀering Class III approved hemostatic agents and the resulting premium pricing
for products that can meet the demanding requirements of the human surgical environment. In 2018, we made
the decision to focus our eﬀorts and resources on accessing these Class III markets to maximize the value
potential of our HemoStyp. The Class III PMA process requires a substantial investment of time and resources
so we made the strategic determination to pause our sales and marketing to non-Class III markets in order to
devote our full attention to the FDA process. Our extensive laboratory testing and our completed human trial
indicate that the HemoStyp technology can successfully compete against established Class III market
participants and allow us to gain a signiﬁcant market share.
  
As of the ﬁling date of this Form 10-K, the FDA PMA review process, which was slowed by the Covid-19
pandemic, is ongoing.
 
 
4
 
 
In anticipation of receiving a Class III PMA, we are evaluating paths to rapidly grow our revenue and
proﬁts in all potential market segments, with the objective of maximizing shareholder value. Options under
consideration include (i) a sale or merger of the Company with an industry leader in the wound care and
surgical device sectors, which may include a pre-sale collaboration on commercialization and distribution, (ii)
one or more commercial partnerships with established market participants, without any speciﬁc, associated
sale or merger transaction, and (iii) a capital raising program to establish and grow our own marketing and
distribution capabilities and drive revenue and proﬁts organically, including a potential business combination
with a cash-rich counterparty that would provide funding for this strategy as well as liquidity for those
Company shareholders that may seek it.
 
The Company has been contacted by several medical technology companies that are active in the
surgical equipment and hemostatic products sectors, and who have expressed an interest in the Company’s
products and business strategy. In response to these inbound contacts, we continue to engage in regular
discussions to evaluate the potential commercial partnerships as we approach the FDA decision on our Class III
PMA application. There can be no assurances that any speciﬁc transaction will occur as a result of this strategy.
No assurances can be given that the Company will identify an acquisition or commercialization candidate(s) or
complete a transaction.
 
Manufacturing and Packaging of our Products
 
The Company’s NORC products are manufactured largely in the United States to our speciﬁcations and
using our equipment through a contract manufacturing arrangement with an FDA certiﬁed contract
manufacturer that maintains stringent quality control protocols to assure the uniformity and quality of all of our
gauze products. Information on our equipment, the manufacturing process and our partner’s facility has been
submitted as part of our PMA submission, which includes the FDA inspection records of the facility.  Certain of
our adhesive bandage formats designed for the 510k market are manufactured by a separate contractor based
in China.
  
Patents and Trademarks
 
Our NORC technology is protected through patents ﬁled with the U.S. Patent and Trademark Oﬃce
(“USPTO”), which protection currently runs through 2029. In 2020 we ﬁled an additional U.S. patent that
protects the use of our NORC technology in a gel or hydrocolloid formulation.
 
The Company has registered trademarks for the following product formats:
 
 •Boo Boo Strips
   
 •The Ultimate Bandage
   
 •Hemostrips
   
 •Nik Fix
 
 
5
 
  
Competition
 
The wound care products market in the United States is dominated by established companies such as
Baxter International, Bristol-Myers Squibb Company, Johnson & Johnson and 3M Company, each of which have
greater capital and operational resources than us. Our hemostatic gauze product will directly compete in the
gauze markets served by these companies. In this market, competitive factors include product performance,
price, range of product oﬀerings, value-added service programs, service and delivery, credit terms, and
customer support.
   
Government Regulation
 
We are subject to oversight by various federal and state governmental entities and we are subject to,
and aﬀected by, a variety of federal and state laws, regulations and policies generally applicable to the
healthcare and medical device industries.
 
Environmental Matters
 
The Company may be subject to, or aﬀected by, environmental legislation including, among others, the
Toxic Substances Control Act, the Clean Air Act, the Clean Water Act, Compensation and Liability Act (aka
CERCLA or Superfund) and the Resource Conservation and Recovery Act. There may be laws and regulations
that exist or that may come to pass that we cannot foresee that may also have an impact on the Company.
Compliance with the multitude of regulations issued by federal, state, provincial and local administrative
agencies that may apply to the Company can be burdensome and costly. To date, the Company has not been
impacted by these laws and regulations.
 
Research and Development Expenditures
 
In the years ending December 31, 2020 and 2019 we incurred $245,218 and $666,388, respectively, in
research and development expenditures.
 
Personnel
 
As of March 24, 2021, we have seven full-time personnel working under consulting agreements.
Additionally, we have four Medical Advisory Board members.
  
ITEM 1A. RISK FACTORS
 
We are engaged in the development, sale and distribution of hemostatic gauze products to stop superﬁcial
bleeding. As we develop our business, there are numerous and varied risks, known and unknown, that may
prevent us from achieving our goals. If any of these risks actually occur, our business, ﬁnancial condition or
results of operation may be materially adversely aﬀected. In such case, the trading price of our common stock
could decline, and investors could lose all or part of their investment.
 
 
6
 
  
RISKS RELATED TO OUR BUSINESS
 
We have a history of operating losses and we may continue to lose money in the future
 
For the years ended December 31, 2020 and 2019, the Company had a net loss of $15,711,400 and
$6,602,295, respectively. We may continue to lose money in the future. For the years ended December 31, 2020
and 2019, the Company had a net loss of $15,711,400 and $6,602,295, respectively. Due to strategic
determination to pause our sales and marketing to non-Class III markets in order to devote our full attention to
the FDA process, we do not expect to generate revenue until that process is successfully completed (which we
cannot assure) and we take steps to commercialize our Hemostyp product. We thus expect to continue to lose
money in the future, and we will rely on ﬁnancing to fund our plans for the foreseeable future as discussed in
the Risk Factor “We will need additional ﬁnancing to execute our business plan and fund operations, which may
not be available”.
  
We can provide no assurances that given that the Class III application for internal surgical
procedures will be approved by the FDA.
 
On March 3, 2021 we participated in a discussion with the Food & Drug Administration (“FDA”) regarding
our Premarket Approval (“PMA”) application, wherein the FDA requested supplemental information relating to
our manufacturing procedures, including quality control related documentation. The FDA also commented that
the form and content of our clinical and non-clinical data has been evaluated and were satisfactory for them
to complete their review process once our application was ﬁnalized. We are collecting the requested
information and incorporating these materials into our PMA application and will to resubmit to the FDA once
completed. There can be no assurance that our application, once revised and resubmitted, will lead to a
successful FDA decision regarding a PMA.
 
Impacts of COVID-19 has delayed the FDA’s review and decision on our application for Class III
PMA of our HemoStyp product.
 
COVID-19 caused a diversion of resources at the FDA which has slowed the review and decision on our
FDA application for Class III PMA of our HemoStyp product for internal surgical purposes. During the fourth
quarter of 2020 the FDA was able to re-engage with us regarding our application. However, due to the FDA’s
focus of attention on the COVID-19 pandemic, we do anticipate that the length of time needed to obtain FDA
approval of our HemoStyp product for internal surgical purposes will be negatively impacted.
 
No assurances can be given that our Management plans to attempt to penetrate all market
segments will be successful.
 
We believe that rather than focusing on immediate sales activities of our products in targeted markets
during this period of time before receiving anticipated FDA approval for Class III surgical markets, that
refocusing the Company to become a stronger, medical technology corporation with a patented technology for
Class III surgical markets is a preferable strategy to enhance the Company’s value and overall market strength.
In this regard, we believe that the Class III surgical markets, both domestic and international, represent the
most attractive market for our products due to the limited competition from other Class III approved ORC
(Oxidized Regenerated Cellulose) products and the resulting premium pricing for hemostatic agents that can
meet the demanding requirements of the human surgical environment. As of the ﬁling date of this Form 10-K,
the FDA review process, which was temporarily held up by the Covid-19 virus pandemic, is ongoing. In the
event we receive Class III approval, the success of which cannot be assured, we are evaluating the best paths
to attempt to rapidly grow our revenue and proﬁts in all potential market segments, which could include one or
more commercial partnerships and licensing agreements with established market participants or an
acquisition/merger agreement with any such participants, each as an alternative to raising the necessary
capital to establish and grow our own marketing and distribution capabilities via organic growth. We will
carefully evaluate the returns on investment to create shareholder value of each of these strategies. No
assurances can be given that our Management plans to attempt to penetrate all market segments or be
acquired/merged with an established market participant will be successful on terms satisfactory to us, if at all.
 
7
 
 
We can provide no assurances that ongoing discussions with potential commercial partners and
acquirers will result in the occurrence of a speciﬁc transaction.
 
The Company has been contacted by several medical technology companies that are active in the
surgical equipment and hemostatic products sectors, and who have expressed an interest in the Company’s
products and business strategy. In response to these inbound contacts, and to maximize shareholder value, the
Company continues to explore a range of strategic alternatives which include, without limitation, entering into
one or more commercial and distribution partnerships, a sale of the Company or a standalone growth plan. To
assist in this review, the Company is working with a ﬁnancial advisory ﬁrm. There can be no assurances that
any speciﬁc transaction will occur as a result of these discussions. No assurances can be given that the
Company will identify a suitable acquisition or commercialization partnership candidate(s) or complete any
transaction on terms that are in the best interests of shareholders.
 
We will need additional ﬁnancing to execute our business plan and fund operations, which may not
be available.
 
We currently have a working capital deﬁcit, minimal cash and limited sales of our products. As result of
the Company’s ﬁnancial position, we may not be able to execute our current business plan and fund business
operations long enough to achieve proﬁtability. Our ultimate success may depend upon our ability to raise
additional capital. There can be no assurance that additional funds will be available when needed from any
source or, if available, will be available on terms that are acceptable to us.
 
We will pursue required additional capital through various means, including commercial collaborations
and debt or equity ﬁnancings. Future ﬁnancings through equity investments are likely to be dilutive to existing
stockholders. Also, the terms of securities we may issue in future capital transactions may be more favorable
for our new investors. Newly issued securities may include preferences, superior voting rights, the issuance of
warrants or other derivative securities. The issuances of incentive awards under existing and future employee
incentive plans, may have additional dilutive eﬀects. Further, we may incur substantial costs in pursuing future
capital and/or ﬁnancing, including investment banking fees, legal fees, accounting fees, printing and
distribution expenses and other costs. We may also be required to recognize non-cash expenses in connection
with certain securities we may issue, such as convertible notes and warrants, which may adversely impact our
ﬁnancial condition.
 
Our ability to obtain needed ﬁnancing may be impaired by such factors as capital markets disruptions,
both generally and speciﬁcally relating to the healthcare industry, and events that have a negative impact on
existing and potential investors or funding sources such as the COVID-19 pandemic. If the amount of capital we
are able to raise from ﬁnancing activities, together with our revenues from operations, is not suﬃcient to
satisfy our capital needs we may be required to cease operations.
 
No guarantee of market acceptance.
 
Our success is dependent on market acceptance of our hemostatic gauze products. We cannot be certain
that healthcare professionals and purchasing decision makers will conclude that our products oﬀer a superior
performance or value proposition, in any or all of the target markets we have identiﬁed, or that we will attain
the level of market acceptance necessary to generate adequate revenues to cover our business costs and
generate a return for investors.
 
We may be dependent upon strategic relationships to conduct our operations and implement our
strategy.
 
Our strategy includes the use of distribution and commercial partnerships to market and sell our
hemostatic gauze products. We currently do not have any such strategic relationships. We may not be able to
establish these strategic relationships, or if established, we may not be able to maintain them. In addition, the
dynamics of our relationships with strategic partners may require us to incur expenses or undertake activities
we would not otherwise be inclined to in order to fulﬁll our obligations to these partners or maintain our
relationships. If our strategic relationships are not established or maintained, our business prospects may be
limited, which could diminish our ability to conduct our operations. We can provide no assurances that
distribution agreements will be entered into on terms satisfactory to us, if at all, or that our operations will be
proﬁtable as a result of these distribution agreements.
 
8
 
 
We could experience diﬃculties in our supply chain.
 
The majority of our NORC products are manufactured in the United States to our speciﬁcations at a
single facility under a service contract. Unforeseen events at this manufacturing location or with this
manufacturer may result in a disruption of production that could negatively impact our ability to supply our
customers and generate revenues. We own certain specialized production equipment which is installed at this
manufacturing location which is not readily available should we need to replace it. While we intend to maintain
signiﬁcant supplies of ﬁnished product inventory, any prolonged disruption this facility could have a material
adverse impact on our operations and business.
 
We are currently dependent on one hemostatic gauze product to generate income in the future.
 
The Company’s hemostatic gauze products are currently our sole source of potential revenue in the
future. While we have multiple formats of this product and hope to access new markets upon receipt of a Class
III PMA, we cannot provide assurance that our product will be accepted by potential customers or that new,
superior hemostatic technologies will not be introduced that negatively impact the market perceptions of our
own products. Unless we are able to develop or acquire additional product lines, the failure to develop a
commercial market for this product line will materially adversely aﬀect our operations.
 
Our business may suﬀer if we do not attract and retain talented personnel.
 
Our success will depend in large measure on the abilities, expertise, judgment, discretion, integrity and
good faith of our management and other personnel in conducting our intended business. In addition, we depend
on management and employees to correctly interpret and respond to market data, economic and other
conditions to locate and adopt appropriate business opportunities. We presently have a small management
team, which we intend to expand in conjunction with our planned operations and growth. We intend to ensure
that management and any key employees are appropriately compensated; however, their continued service to
the Company cannot be guaranteed. If we are unable to attract and retain additional key management
personnel and enter into satisfactory employment and other agreements, our business may be adversely
aﬀected.
 
We may not be able to adequately protect our technologies or intellectual property rights.
 
Our ability to achieve commercial or strategic success will depend in part on maintaining patent
protection and trade secret protection of our technologies as well as successfully defending our intellectual
property against third-party challenges. We will only be able to protect our technologies from unauthorized use
by third parties to the extent that valid and enforceable patents or trade secrets cover them. Furthermore, the
degree of future protection of our proprietary rights is uncertain because legal means aﬀord only limited
protection and may not adequately protect our rights or permit us to gain or keep our competitive advantage.
Additionally, legal enforcement of intellectual property rights is costly and we may not have the ﬁnancial
resources to take the necessary legal action to protect our rights.
 
If our intellectual property positions are challenged, invalidated, circumvented, or expire, or if we fail to
prevail in future intellectual property litigation, our business could be adversely aﬀected. We have created
multiple variations of our gauze product and will protect each of these new generation platforms and product
with additional intellectual property. Our success depends in part on our ability to defend our intellectual
property rights. The patent positions of pharmaceutical and biotechnology companies can be highly uncertain
and often involve complex legal, scientiﬁc, and factual questions. Third parties may seek to challenge,
invalidate, or circumvent our intellectual property rights. In addition, our patent positions might not protect us
against competitors with similar products or technologies because competing products or technologies may not
infringe our patents. Also, there are third parties who have patents or pending patent applications that they
may claim necessitate payment of a royalty or prevent us from commercializing our patent in certain
territories. Patent disputes are frequent, costly and can preclude, delay, or increase the cost of
commercialization of products.
 
 
9
 
  
We have identiﬁed various material weaknesses in our internal control over ﬁnancial reporting
which could aﬀect our ability to timely and accurately report our results of operations and
ﬁnancial condition. These material weaknesses may not have been fully remediated as of the
ﬁling date of this report and we cannot assure you that other material weaknesses will not be
identiﬁed in the future.
 
Our Chief Executive Oﬃcer and Principal Financial Oﬃcer have concluded that, as of December 31,
2020, we had material weaknesses in our internal controls over ﬁnancial reporting and that, as a result, our
disclosure controls and procedures and our internal controls over ﬁnancial reporting were not eﬀective at such
date. A material weakness is a deﬁciency, or combination of deﬁciencies, in internal control over ﬁnancial
reporting that creates a reasonable possibility that a material misstatement of our annual or interim ﬁnancial
statements will not be prevented or detected on a timely basis.
 
In addition, we believe that we continued to have material weaknesses in our internal control over
ﬁnancial reporting subsequent to December 31, 2020. See “Controls and Procedures” under Item 9A for a
detailed discussion of the material weaknesses identiﬁed as of December 31, 2020 and possible material
weaknesses as of subsequent periods. Although we are in the process of implementing remedial measures to
address all of the identiﬁed material weaknesses, our assessment of the impact of these measures has not
been completed as of the ﬁling date of this report, and we cannot assure you that these measures will be
adequate. Moreover, we cannot assure you that additional material weaknesses in our internal control over
ﬁnancial reporting will not arise or be identiﬁed in the future.
 
As a result, we must continue to improve our operational, information technology, and ﬁnancial
systems, infrastructure, procedures, and controls, as well as continue to expand, train, retain, and manage our
employee base. Any failure to do so, or any diﬃculties we encounter during implementation, could result in
additional material weaknesses or in material misstatements in our ﬁnancial statements. These
misstatements could result in a future restatement of our ﬁnancial statements, could cause us to fail to meet
our reporting obligations, or could cause investors to lose conﬁdence in our reported ﬁnancial information,
leading to a decline in our stock price.
 
Our independent registered public accounting ﬁrm has expressed substantial doubt about our
ability to continue as a going concern. This could make it more diﬃcult for us to raise funds and
adversely aﬀect our relationships with creditors, investors and suppliers.
 
 Our auditors believe that substantial doubt exists regarding our ability to remain in business. We cannot
provide any assurance that we will in fact operate our business proﬁtably or obtain suﬃcient ﬁnancing to
sustain our business in the event we are not successful in our eﬀorts to generate suﬃcient revenue and
operating cash ﬂow. The expression of such doubt by our independent registered public accounting ﬁrm or our
inability to overcome the factors leading to such doubt could have a material adverse eﬀect on our
relationships with prospective customers, creditors, investors and suppliers, and therefore could have a
material adverse eﬀect on our business.
 
The healthcare industry is subject to extensive government regulation, which can result in
increased costs, delays, limits on its operating ﬂexibility and competitive disadvantages.
 
The healthcare industry is generally subject to extensive regulatory requirements. Adhering to these
requirements generally carries signiﬁcant costs to industry participants, including our Company. Given our
limited ﬁnancial resources these signiﬁcant costs may adversely aﬀect our business and ﬁnancial results. If we
are unable to pass on these costs through our product pricing they would negatively impact our proﬁt margin.
 
Healthcare insurance legislation may lead to unintended adverse eﬀects for businesses involved in our
industry. New legislation that gives the Federal government greater regulatory powers may lead to negative
consequences for certain aspects of our business. The full scope of the ongoing uncertainty in healthcare
related legislation may not be known for several years, making it diﬃcult to predict the future consequences
that would create challenges to our Company, or if we can overcome them.
 
Failure to comply with laws or government regulations could result in penalties.
 
Certain government requirements for technologies in the healthcare market may require licensure or
mandatory minimum standards relating to the provision of products and services. Failure to comply with these
requirements could materially aﬀect our ability to expand into new or existing markets. Future regulatory
developments may also cause disruptions to our operations.
 
GENERAL RISK FACTORS
 
We are subject to the reporting requirements of the federal securities laws, which can be
expensive.
 
We are a public reporting company and, accordingly, subject to the information and reporting
requirements of the Exchange Act and other federal and state securities laws, including compliance with the
Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002. The costs of preparing and ﬁling annual and quarterly reports, proxy statements
and other information with the SEC and furnishing audited reports to stockholders increase our operating costs.
 
It is time consuming, diﬃcult and costly for us to develop and implement the internal controls and
reporting procedures required by the Sarbanes-Oxley Act. We may need to hire additional ﬁnancial reporting,
internal controls and other ﬁnance personnel in order to develop and implement appropriate internal controls
and reporting procedures. If we are unable to comply with the internal control’s requirements of the Sarbanes-
Oxley Act, we may not be able to obtain the independent accountant certiﬁcations required by that Act.
 
 
10
 
  
Public company compliance requirements may make it more diﬃcult to attract and retain oﬃcers
and directors.
 
The Sarbanes-Oxley Act and rules subsequently implemented by the SEC have required changes in
corporate governance practices of public companies. Compliance with the new rules and regulations increases
our operating costs and makes certain activities more time consuming and costly than if we were not a public
company. As a public company, these new rules and regulations make it more diﬃcult and expensive for us to
obtain director and oﬃcer liability insurance. As a result, it may be more diﬃcult for us to attract and retain
qualiﬁed persons to serve on our Board of Directors or as executive oﬃcers.
 
There exist risks to stockholders relating to dilution: authorization of additional securities and
reduction of percentage share ownership following investment.
 
To the extent that additional shares of common stock are issued, our existing stockholders would
experience dilution of their respective ownership interests in the Company. Additionally, if the Company issues
a substantial number of shares of common stock in connection with or following an investment, a change in
control of the Company may occur which may aﬀect, among other things, the Company’s ability to utilize net
operating loss carry forwards, if any. Furthermore, the issuance of a substantial number of shares of common
stock may adversely aﬀect prevailing market prices for our common stock and could impair the Company’s
ability to raise additional capital through the sale of its equity securities. The Company has in the past and may
in the future compensate certain consultants and other service providers using our shares of common stock,
which would result in further dilution for our existing stockholders.
 
Our stock price may be volatile.
 
The market price of our common stock is likely to be highly volatile and could ﬂuctuate widely in
response to various factors, many of which are beyond our control, including the following:
 
 •changes in the healthcare industry;
 •competitive pricing pressures;
 •our ability to obtain working capital ﬁnancing;
 •additions or departures of key personnel;
 •our ability to execute our business plan;
 •operating results that fall short of expectations;
 •loss of certain material strategic relationships;
 •regulatory developments;
 •economic and other external factors, including among others, eﬀects on the markets stemming from
the COVID-19 pandemic; and
 •period-to-period ﬂuctuations in our ﬁnancial results.
 
In addition, the securities markets have from time-to-time experienced signiﬁcant price and volume
ﬂuctuations that are unrelated to the operating performance of particular companies. These market ﬂuctuations
may also materially and adversely aﬀect the market price of our common stock.
 
We have not paid dividends in the past and do not expect to pay dividends in the future. Any
return on investment may be limited to changes in the value of our common stock.
 
We have never paid cash dividends on our common stock and do not anticipate doing so in the
foreseeable future. The payment of cash dividends on our common stock will depend on earnings, ﬁnancial
condition and other business and economic factors aﬀecting us at such time as our board of directors may
consider relevant. If we do not pay dividends, return on investment will only occur if our stock price
appreciates.
 
There is currently no established market for our common stock, and we cannot ensure that one
will ever develop or be sustained.
 
The Company’s common stock is available for trading on the OTC Pink. Management considers the
market for our common stock to be limited. We can provide no assurances that an established trading market
for our common stock will exist in the future.
 
 
11
 
 
Our common stock is deemed a “penny stock”, which may make it more diﬃcult for our investors
to sell their shares.
 
Our common stock is subject to the “penny stock” rules adopted under Section 15(g) of the Securities
Exchange Act of 1934. The penny stock rules apply to companies whose common stock is not listed on a
national securities exchange and trades at less than $5.00 per share or that have tangible net worth of less
than $5,000,000 ($2,000,000 if the company has been operating for three or more years). These rules require,
among other things, that brokers who trade penny stock to persons other than “established customers”
complete certain documentation, make suitability inquiries of investors and provide investors with certain
information concerning trading in the security, including a risk disclosure document and quote information
under certain circumstances. Many brokers have decided not to trade penny stocks because of the
requirements of the penny stock rules and, as a result, the number of broker-dealers willing to act as market
makers in such securities is limited. If we remain subject to the penny stock rules for any signiﬁcant period, it
could have an adverse eﬀect on the market, if any, for our securities. In as much as our securities are subject
to the penny stock rules, investors may ﬁnd it more diﬃcult to dispose of our securities.
 
Oﬀers or availability for sale of a substantial number of shares of our common stock may cause
the price of our common stock to decline.
 
If certain of our stockholders seek to sell substantial amounts of our common stock in the public market
upon the expiration of any holding period under Rule 144, or expiration of lock-up periods applicable to
outstanding shares, or issued upon the exercise of outstanding options or warrants, it could create a
circumstance commonly referred to as an “overhang” and in anticipation of which the market price of our
common stock could fall. The existence of an overhang, whether or not sales have occurred or are occurring,
also could make more diﬃcult our ability to raise additional ﬁnancing through the sale of equity or equity-
related securities in the future at a time and price that we deem reasonable or appropriate.
 
Impacts of COVID-19 to Business and the General Economy
   
COVID-19 has caused a material and substantial adverse impact on the general economy, the impacts
of which are currently not fully known. We are conducting business as usual with some modiﬁcations to,
employee work locations, among other modiﬁcations We have observed other companies taking precautionary
and preemptive actions to address COVID-19 and companies may take further actions that alter their normal
business operations. We will continue to actively monitor the situation and may take further actions that alter
our business operations as may be required by federal, state or local authorities or that we determine are in
the best interests of our employees, potential partners, suppliers and stockholders.
  
ITEM 1B. UNRESOLVED STAFF COMMENTS
 
None
 
ITEM 2. DESCRIPTION OF PROPERTY
 
The Company is utilizing on a temporary basis rent free, as a central mailing address as its principal
executive oﬃce, space located at 10624 S. Eastern Avenue, Ste. A209, Henderson, NV 89052. Conference
facilities are available upon request at a fee. The Company is a virtual company with personnel in Nevada and
ﬁve other states working remotely.
 
ITEM 3. LEGAL PROCEEDINGS
 
The following material legal proceedings are pending against us:
 
A Complaint was ﬁled with the United States District Court, Southern District of New York by Steven
Safran as Plaintiﬀ against the Company and Douglas Beplate, its CEO, as Defendant. This case was transferred
to the United States District Court in Las Vegas, Nevada. Mr. Safran is seeking damages and monies allegedly
owed pursuant to an employment agreement of approximately $734,000 and allegedly unpaid loans of
$245,824 provided to Defendants. The Company has denied Plaintiﬀ’s allegations and intends to vigorously
defend this lawsuit. The parties have held various depositions and the Company made a motion to dismiss
which was denied. The Plaintiﬀ ﬁled a motion to amend his complaint and the Company has submitted
opposition papers and we are awaiting an order from the Court. A trial is scheduled for August 10, 2021.
  
In March 2021, the Company received payment of $304,273 from Maxim Group LLC, representing the full
settlement payment in accordance with a Settlement Agreement in a previously disclosed arbitration between
the Company and Maxim that was settled in December 2019.
 
 
12
 
 
Philip Forman, who served in positions as Chairman, a director, Chief Executive Oﬃcer and Chief Medical
Advisor at various time between 2011 and October 2015, ﬁled a lawsuit against the Company and our Chief
Executive Oﬃcer, Douglas Beplate, in the United States District Court of the District of Nevada. The claimant
has claimed, among other things, that: the June 25, 2015 Amendment to his November 10, 2014 Employment
Agreement with the Company, which terminated the Employment Agreement on October 1, 2015, is not valid
because of lack of consideration; that a July 22, 2015 Stock Purchase Agreement pursuant to which the
claimant sold Company shares issued to him under the Amendment to a third a party is unenforceable (despite
the fact that all payment for the shares under the Stock Purchase Agreement was made); that the plaintiﬀ’s
2014 Employment Agreement is enforceable and that he is entitled to cash and stock compensation under that
Employment Agreement (without giving regard to the Amendment); that if the Amendment is enforceable, he is
entitled to the shares issued under the Amendment (without mention that those shares were sold to a third
party under the Stock Purchase Agreement described above); and that the Company and Mr. Beplate defrauded
the plaintiﬀ relating to the foregoing. The plaintiﬀ is seeking declaratory judgment regarding the parties’
relative rights under the Employment Agreement, the Amendment and the Stock Purchase Agreement; money
damages of no less than $2,795,000; and punitive damages of $8,280,000. The Company believes that it has
meritorious defenses to the matters claimed as well as counterclaims against the claimant. The Company ﬁled
a motion to dismiss the plaintiﬀ’s claims which was denied on March 19, 2020. Discovery is now taking place.
  
FSR Inc. commenced a lawsuit in 2018 against Korsair Holdings A.G. in the U.S. District Court for the
Southern District of New York, seeking among other claims for relief, rescission of the transfer of 3,050,000
shares of United Health Products that FSR sold to Korsair in 2011. Third-Party Plaintiﬀ, JEC Consulting
Associates, LLC as Liquidator of LeadDog Capital L.P., Intervenor (“Intervenor”) in the above matter, ﬁled a
third-party complaint against United Health Products, and Douglas Beplate alleging among other things that the
Company and Mr. Beplate refused to have the Rule 144 restrictive legend removed from the Korsair certiﬁcate
held by JEC, and concomitantly fraudulently deprive JEC as Liquidator of LeadDog of the ability to sell the
Shares in the open market, knowingly, intentionally and directly causing economic harm to LeadDog Capital
L.P. Intervenor as Third Party Plaintiﬀ further alleges that the Company and Mr. Beplate as Third-Party
Defendants are not only monetarily liable to Third-Party Plaintiﬀ for compensatory damages of $2,500,000 but
should be made to pay exemplary damages in an amount determined by the Court, but not less than an equal
amount - $2,500,000. Third-Party Plaintiﬀ demands judgment for the above referenced amounts and for the
Court to also declare that the 3,050,000 shares are free trading; that Third-Party Plaintiﬀ’s rights to 2.5 million
of the Shares are superior to the claims of Plaintiﬀ FSR; that Plaintiﬀ FSR has no claim to 2.5 million of the
3,050,000 Shares reﬂected by the Korsair certiﬁcate; that the Company and Mr. Beplate are to instruct its
current transfer agent to remove the restrictive legend on the Korsair certiﬁcate for the Shares; and an order
directing the Company and Mr. Beplate to instruct the Company’s transfer agent to exchange the Korsair
certiﬁcate for new free-trading, unrestricted certiﬁcates. The Company believes that it had legal right to decline
to instruct the transfer agent to remove the restrictive legend from the Korsair Shares where the ownership of
the aforementioned shares have been in dispute and the Korsair shares have not been submitted for transfer to
its transfer agent in proper form under the uniform commercial code. The Court granted the motion for a
default by FSR, Inc against Korsair Holdings, AG., but denied any claim for relief against UHP. The Court ruled
that the SEC must review the claim before the matter can proceed in Court. The SEC has yet to render a
determination.
  
Due to uncertainties inherent in litigation, we cannot predict the outcome of the legal proceedings
described herein.
  
In 2020 the Company commenced the following legal proceeding:
 
On February 7, 2020, the Company ﬁled the Original Petition for Fraud and Breach of Contract in the
Texas District Court for the 215th Judicial District of Harris County against defendants Patterson Companies Inc.,
Patterson Management, L.P., Patterson Veterinary, Inc. and Patterson Logistics Services, Inc., and Animal Health
International, Inc. On March 5, 2020, the defendants removed the case to U.S. District Court for Southern
District of Texas. The defendants ﬁled their answer in federal court on March 12, 2020. The original August 25,
2020 pretrial deadlines were extended and we expect the case to be trial ready by the end of 2021.
 
The defendants ﬁled a Motion for Summary Judgment which was denied by the court on March 11, 2021.
  
In August 2020, United Health Products ﬁled suit against its former auditors, Haynie & Company, in Utah
State Court, asserting claims related to professional negligence and breach of ﬁduciary duty. Haynie &
Company has denied the allegations. The parties are conducting discovery.
 
ITEM 4. MINE SAFETY DISCLOSURES
 
None.
 
 
13
 
 
PART II
 
ITEM 5. MARKET FOR COMMON EQUITY, RELATED STOCKHOLDER MATTERS, AND ISSUER
PURCHASES OF EQUITY SECURITIES.
 
(a) Market information
 
The common shares of the Company trade on the OTC Pink under the symbol UEEC. There has been only
limited trading activity to date. The following table sets forth the high and low sales price of the common stock
on a quarterly basis for the periods presented, rounded to the nearest penny.
 
   High  Low  
For Year Ended 2020         
First Quarter  $ 1.30  $ 0.60 
Second Quarter  $ 0.86  $ 0.71 
Third Quarter  $ 1.89  $ 0.55 
Fourth Quarter  $ 1.49  $ 1.28 
            
For Year Ended 2019           
First Quarter  $ 1.01  $ 0.64 
Second Quarter  $ 0.99  $ 0.80 
Third Quarter  $ 2.45  $ 0.94 
Fourth Quarter  $ 1.48  $ 0.97 
 
(b) Holders
 
As of March 24, 2021, there were approximately 381 holders of record of the Company’s issued and
outstanding shares of common stock.
  
(c) Dividends
 
The Company has not paid any dividends to date, has not yet generated earnings suﬃcient to pay
dividends, and currently does not intend to pay dividends in the foreseeable future.
  
 
14
 
 
(d) Stock Issuances and Repurchases
 
The following summarizes all sales of our unregistered securities during the year ended December 31,
2020. The securities in the below-referenced transactions were (i) issued without registration and (ii) were
subject to restrictions under the Securities Act and the securities laws of certain states, in reliance on the
private oﬀering exemptions contained in Sections 4(a)(2), 4(a)(6) and/or 3(b) of the Securities Act and on
Regulation D promulgated under the Securities Act, and in reliance on similar exemptions under applicable
state laws as transactions not involving a public oﬀering. No placement or underwriting fees were paid in
connection with these transactions. All cash proceeds from the sale of securities were used for working capital
purposes.
  
Date of Sale Title of
Security Number Sold Consideration Received 
Jan. – March 31, 2020           
   Common Stock 1,467,500 $826,696 in cash, $47,500 in
services rendered 
April – June 30, 2020           
   Common Stock 683,000 $279,000 in cash, $100,625 in
services rendered 
July – Sept. 30, 2020           
   Common Stock 250,000  $153,750 in services rendered 
   Common Stock
 7,595,000
 N/A. Issued upon vesting and
settlement of Restricted Stock
Unit awards(1) 
October – Dec. 31, 2020           
   Common Stock 1,083,634 $866,482 conversion of debt at
$0.50 per/ share 
___________
(1) See Item 11 Executive Compensation under the heading Stock Awards – Restricted Stock Units for a
discussion about the Restricted Stock Unit Agreements under which these shares were issued.                
 
During the period January 1, 2020 through December 31, 2020, there were no repurchases of the
Company’s unregistered securities.
 
ITEM 6. SELECTED FINANCIAL DATA
 
Not applicable.
 
ITEM 7. MANAGEMENT’S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS OF FINANCIAL CONDITION AND RESULTS OF
OPERATION
 
You should read the following discussion and analysis of our ﬁnancial condition and results of operations
together with our ﬁnancial statements and related notes appearing elsewhere in this annual report on Form 10-
K. This discussion and analysis contain forward-looking statements that involve risks, uncertainties and
assumptions. The actual results may diﬀer materially from those anticipated in these forward-looking
statements as a result of certain factors, including, but not limited to, those set forth under ‘Risk Factors’ and
elsewhere in this annual report on Form 10-K.
 
 
15
 
 
Results of Operations years ending December 31, 2020 and 2019
 
The following table sets forth a summary of certain key ﬁnancial information for the years ended December 31,
2020 and 2019:
 
   2020   2019 
          
Revenue  $ 643  $ 4,927 
            
Gross proﬁt  $ 448  $ 3,611 
            
Operating (expenses)  $(14,849,099) $(6,097,723)
            
Operating (loss)  $(14,848,651) $(6,094,112)
            
Other income (expense)  $(862,749) $(508,183)
            
Net (loss)  $(15,711,400) $(6,602,295)
            
Basic and diluted  $ (0.09) $ (0.04)
 
Year ended December 31, 2020 versus year ended December 31, 2019
 
During the year ended December 31, 2020 and 2019, the Company had $643 and $4,927 of revenues,
respectively. The decrease in revenues is due to the continued focus, which commenced in 2018, of the
Company’s capital and resources towards making our NORC technology and products more commercially
viable by seeking to obtain a Class III PMA. The Company is continuing this strategy based on our belief that
the greatest value to our shareholders will come from this PMA and, if granted, pursuing opportunities that we
anticipate will be available to the Company.
 
Total operating expenses for the year ended December 31, 2020 and 2019 were $14,849,099 and
$6,097,723, respectively. The increase in operating expenses is due primarily to an increase in
consulting/professional fees oﬀset by a decrease in research and development expenses. The increase in
operating expenses is due primarily to an increase in stock-based compensation expense. The Company
recorded $12,420,930 of stock-based compensation related to an amendment to the restricted stock award
agreement made during the year. The amendment resulted in the vesting of 7,595,000 of restricted stock unit
(“RSU”) awards and the immediate recognition of $5,392,450 of expenses and also $7,028,480 of stock-based
compensation due to the amortization of the RSUs that vested on January 1, 2021 compared to stock-based
compensation expense of $2,021,000 due to the change in vesting conditions of 2,150,000 shares of common
stock previously held in escrow during the year ended December 31, 2019.
 
In addition, the Company issued 425,000 shares of common stock for services with a value of $301,875
during the year ended December 31, 2020 compared to 1,925,000 shares of common stock for services valued
at $1,859,250 during the year ended December 31, 2019.
 
The increase in stock-based compensation was oﬀset by a decrease in research and development
expense of $421,170.
 
Other income (expense) for 2020 and 2019 was $(862,749) and $(508,183), respectively. The increase in
other expense was due to the increase in total interest expense of $38,045 and loss on debt settlement of
$316,521. The increase in interest expense is due to the amortization of beneﬁcial conversion features on
convertible notes payable and convertible notes payable – related party during the current year totaling
$546,228 compared to $508,183 in the prior year. The loss on debt settlement is due to the Company issuing
shares of common stock with a fair value of $866,482 for the conversion of $549,567 of convertible notes
payable and accrued interest.
 
 
16
 
 
Our net loss for the year ended December 31, 2020 was $15,711,400 as compared to a net loss of
$6,602,295 for the prior year. The increase in the net loss is due to an increase in stock-based stock
compensation of $8,842,555, a decrease in research and development expenses of $421,170 and an increase in
the loss on debt settlement of $316,521 compared to the prior year for the reasons described above.
 
Financial Condition, Liquidity and Capital Resources
 
As of December 31, 2020, the Company had a negative working capital of $1,054,612. The Company has
not yet attained a level of operations, and for the foreseeable future will not be pursuing commercial
operations, which will allow it to meet its current overhead expense obligations while it focuses on its strategy
of seeking an FDA Class III PMA. The report of our independent registered public accounting ﬁrm on our 2020
and 2019 ﬁnancial statements includes an explanatory paragraph expressing substantial doubt about our
ability to continue as a going concern. While the Company has funded its initial operations with private
placements, and secured loans from related parties, there can be no assurance that adequate ﬁnancing will
continue to be available to the Company and, if available, on terms that are favorable to the Company. Our
ability to continue as a going concern is also dependent on many events outside of our direct control, including,
among other things, our ability to achieve our business goals and objectives, as well as improvement in the
economic climate.
 
Cash Flows
 
The Company’s cash on hand as of December 31, 2020 and 2019 was $46,076 and $16,624, respectively.
 
The following table summarizes selected items from our statements of cash ﬂows for the years ended
December 31, 2020 and 2019:
 
(in thousands)  2020  2019 
Net cash used in operating activities  $(1,325,862) $(1,766,764)
Net cash used in investing activities   (101,350)   - 
Net cash provided by ﬁnancing activities   1,456,664   1,752,115 
            
Net increase (decrease) in cash and cash equivalents  $29,452  $(14,649)
 
Net Cash Provided by (Used in) Operating Activities
 
Net cash used in operating activities for the year ended December 31, 2020 was $1,325,862. The
Company had net loss of $15,711,400 oﬀset by stock-based compensation of $12,722,805, amortization of debt
discount of $535,766, write-oﬀ of inventory of $6,979, loss on debt settlement of $316,521, a decrease in
inventory of $195, an increase in accounts payable and accrued expenses of $360,465 and an increase in
accrued liabilities - related party of $442,807.
 
Net cash used in operating activities for the year ended December 31, 2019 was $1,766,764. The
Company had a net loss of $6,602,295 oﬀset by stock-based compensation of $3,880,250 and amortization of
debt discount of $508,183. The Company also had an increase in inventory of $44,868, an increase in accounts
payable and accrued expenses of $367,836, and an increase in accrued liabilities – related party of $74,130.
 
Net Cash Used by Investing Activities
 
Net cash used in investing activities for the year ended December 31, 2020 was $101,350, used to
purchase manufacturing equipment during the year.
 
The Company did not have any investing activities during the year ended December 31, 2019.
 
 
17
 
  
Net Cash Provided by (Used in) Financing Activities
 
Net cash provided by ﬁnancing activities for the year ended December 31, 2020 was $1,456,664. This
was due to the Company receiving $1,130,696 in proceeds from the sale of stock and receiving a total of
$831,730 from related parties oﬀset by repaying $505,762 on related party loans.
 
Net cash provided by ﬁnancing activities for the year ended December 31, 2019 was $1,752,115. This
was due to the Company receiving $1,255,750 in proceeds from the sale of stock and receiving net proceeds of
$496,365 from a related party.
 
 Oﬀ-Balance Sheet Arrangements
 
As of December 31, 2020 and 2019, we had no oﬀ-balance sheet arrangements.
 
Related Parties
 
Information concerning related party transactions is included in the ﬁnancial statements and related
notes, appearing elsewhere in this annual report on Form 10-K.
 
Critical Accounting Policies
 
Revenue Recognition
 
The Company recognizes revenue in accordance with ASC 606, Revenue from Contracts with Customers.
Under ASC 606, the Company recognizes revenue from the sale of its HemoStyp product by applying the
following steps: (1) identify the contract with a customer; (2) identify the performance obligations in the
contract; (3) determine the transaction price; (4) allocate the transaction price to each performance obligation
in the contract; and (5) recognize revenue when each performance obligation is satisﬁed.
 
The Company receives orders for its HemoStyp products directly from its customers. Revenues are
recognized based on the agreed upon sales or transaction price with the customer when control of the promised
goods are transferred to the customer. The transfer of goods to the customer and satisfaction of the Company’s
performance obligation will occur either at the time when products are shipped or when the products arrive and
are received by the customer. No discounts were oﬀered by the Company. The Company does not provide an
estimate for returns as there is no anticipation for any returns in the normal course of business.
 
Stock Based Compensation
 
The Company accounts for share-based compensation under the provisions of ASC 718, Compensation-
Stock Compensation. Under the fair value recognition provisions, stock-based compensation expense is
measured at the fair value of the consideration received, or the fair value of the equity instruments issued, or
liabilities incurred, whichever is more reliably measured. Share-based compensation for all stock-based awards
to employees and directors is recognized as an expense over the requisite service period, which is generally
the vesting period.
 
The Company accounts for stock compensation arrangements with non-employees in accordance with
Accounting Standard Update (ASU) 2018-07, Compensation—Stock Compensation (Topic 718): Improvements to
Nonemployee Share-Based Payment Accounting, which requires that such equity instruments are recorded at
the value on the grant date. 
 
 
18
 
 
ITEM 8. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND SUPPLEMENTARY DATA
 
The ﬁnancial statements required by Item 8 can be found beginning on Page F-2 of this report. 
 
Report of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm
   
To the Board of Directors and Stockholders of United Health Products, Inc.
 
Opinion on the Financial Statements
 
We have audited the accompanying balance sheets of United Health Products, Inc. as of December 31, 2020
and 2019, and the related statements of operations, stockholders’ deﬁciency, and cash ﬂows for each of the
two years in the period ended December 31, 2020, and the related notes (collectively referred to as the
“ﬁnancial statements”). In our opinion, the ﬁnancial statements present fairly, in all material respects, the
ﬁnancial position of United Health Products, Inc. as of December 31, 2020 and 2019, and the results of its
operations and its cash ﬂows for each of the two years in the period ended December 31, 2020, in conformity
with accounting principles generally accepted in the United States of America.
 
Going Concern
 
The accompanying ﬁnancial statements have been prepared assuming that the entity will continue as a going
concern. As discussed in Note 2 to the ﬁnancial statements, the entity has suﬀered recurring losses from
operations, has negative working capital and operations have not provided cash ﬂows to cover operating
expenses or meet current obligations. This raises substantial doubt about its ability to continue as a going
concern. Management’s plans in regard to these matters are also described in Note 2. The ﬁnancial statements
do not include any adjustments that might result from the outcome of this uncertainty.
 
Basis for Opinion
 
These ﬁnancial statements are the responsibility of the entity’s management. Our responsibility is to express
an opinion on these ﬁnancial statements based on our audits. We are a public accounting ﬁrm registered with
the Public Company Accounting Oversight Board (United States) (“PCAOB”) and are required to be independent
with respect to United Health Products, Inc. in accordance with the U.S. federal securities laws and the
applicable rules and regulations of the Securities and Exchange Commission and the PCAOB.
 
We conducted our audits in accordance with the standards of the PCAOB. Those standards require that we plan
and perform the audit to obtain reasonable assurance about whether the ﬁnancial statements are free of
material misstatement, whether due to error or fraud. United Health Products, Inc. is not required to have, nor
were we engaged to perform, an audit of its internal control over ﬁnancial reporting. As part of our audits we
are required to obtain an understanding of internal control over ﬁnancial reporting but not for the purpose of
expressing an opinion on the eﬀectiveness of the entity’s internal control over ﬁnancial reporting. Accordingly,
we express no such opinion.
 
Our audits included performing procedures to assess the risks of material misstatement of the ﬁnancial
statements, whether due to error or fraud, and performing procedures that respond to those risks. Such
procedures included examining, on a test basis, evidence regarding the amounts and disclosures in the
ﬁnancial statements. Our audits also included evaluating the accounting principles used and signiﬁcant
estimates made by management, as well as evaluating the overall presentation of the ﬁnancial statements.
We believe that our audits provide a reasonable basis for our opinion.
 
Critical Audit Matters
 
Critical audit matters are matters arising from the current period audit of the ﬁnancial statements that were
communicated or required to be communicated to the audit committee and that: (1) relate to accounts or
disclosures that are material to the ﬁnancial statements and (2) involved our especially challenging, subjective,
or complex judgments. We determined that there are no critical audit matters.
 
/s/ Mac Accounting Group, LLP
 
We have served as United Health Products, Inc.’s auditor since 2019.
 
Midvale, Utah
 
March 30, 2021
  
 
F-1
 
    
UNITED HEALTH PRODUCTS, INC
Balance Sheets
 
   December
31,
2020  December
31,
2019 
          
Current Assets         
Cash and Cash Equivalents  $ 46,076  $ 16,624 
Inventory    69,674    76,848 
Total current assets    115,750    93,472 
            
Property and equipment    101,350    - 
            
TOTAL ASSETS  $ 217,100  $ 93,472 
            
Current Liabilities           
Accounts payable and accrued expenses  $ 416,759  $ 512,476 
Accrued liabilities – related party    193,651    119,016 
Convertible notes payable, net of debt discount    103,920    - 
Convertible notes payable - related parties, net of debt discount    456,032    365,785 
Total current liabilities   1,170,362    997,277 
            
TOTAL LIABILITIES   1,170,362    997,277 
            
Commitments and Contingencies    -    - 
            
Stockholders’ Deﬁciency           
            
Common Stock - $.001 par value, 300,000,000 shares authorized, 189,357,090
and 178,060,337 shares issued at December 31, 2020 and 2019  189,357   178,300 
Additional paid-in capital   40,696,640   25,045,754 
Accumulated deﬁcit   (41,839,259)  (26,127,859)
Total stockholders’ deﬁciency   (953,262)  (903,805)
            
TOTAL LIABILITIES AND STOCKHOLDERS’ DEFICIENCY  $ 217,100  $ 93,472 
 
See notes to ﬁnancial statements.
 
 
F-2
 
 
UNITED HEALTH PRODUCTS, INC
Statements of Operations
 
   2020   2019  
          
Revenues  $ 643  $ 4,927 
Cost of sales    195    1,316 
Gross proﬁt    448    3,611 
            
Operating Costs and Expenses           
Selling, general and administrative expenses   14,603,881   5,431,335 
Research and development expenses    245,218    666,388 
Total Operating Expenses   14,849,099   6,097,723 
            
Loss from Operations   (14,848,651)  (6,094,112)
            
Other income (expenses)           
Interest expense   (210,025)   - 
Interest expense – related party   (336,203)  (508,183)
Loss on settlement of debt   (316,521)   - 
Total other income (expense)   (862,749)  (508,183)
            
Income tax expense    -    - 
            
Net Loss  $(15,711,400) $(6,602,295)
            
Net Loss per common share:           
Basic and diluted  $ (0.09) $ (0.04)
            
Weighted average number of shares outstanding   183,756,271   175,876,273 
 
See notes to ﬁnancial statements.
 
 
F-3
 
  
UNITED HEALTH PRODUCTS, INC
Statement of Stockholders’ Deﬁciency
For the Years Ended December 31, 2020 and 2019
 
         Additional       
    Common Stock   Paid-in  Accumulated    
   Shares  Amount  Capital  Deﬁcit  Total 
                      
Balance at December 31, 2018   173,943,138  $173,943  $19,200,927  $(19,525,564) $(150,694)
                           
Stock-based compensation
modiﬁcation expense on shares
held in escrow  
-   
-   
2,021,000   
-   
2,021,000 
                           
Issuance of common stock for
services  1,925,000   1,925   1,857,325   -   1,859,250 
                           
Issuance of shares for notes
payable – related party  410,000   410   204,590   -   205,000 
                           
Sale of common stock   2,022,199    2,022   1,253,728    -   1,255,750 
                           
Beneﬁcial conversion feature    -    -   508,183    -    508,183 
                           
Net Loss    -    -        (6,602,295)  (6,602,295)
                           
Balance at December 31, 2019   178,300,337   178,300   25,045,754   (26,127,859)  (903,805)
                           
Beneﬁcial conversion feature    -    -   909,565    -    909,565 
                           
Issuance of common stock for
services  425,000   425   301,450   -   301,875 
                           
Stock-based compensation on
vesting of restricted stock units  7,595,000   7,595   12,413,335   -   12,420,930 
                           
Issuance of common stock for debt  1,058,634    1,059   865,423    -    866,482 
                           
Sale of common stock   2,000,500    2,000   1,128,696    -   1,130,696 
                           
Cancelled shares    (22,381)   (22)   22    -    - 
                           
Forgiveness of related party debt   -    -    32,395    -    32,395 
                           
Net Loss    -    -        (15,711,400)  (15,711,400)
                           
Balance at December 31, 2020   189,357,090  $189,357  $40,696,640  $(41,839,259) $(953,262)
 
See notes to ﬁnancial statements.
 
 
F-4
 
 
UNITED HEALTH PRODUCTS, INC
Statements of Cash Flows
 
   2020   2019 
          
Cash Flows from Operating Activities:         
Net Loss  $(15,711,400) $(6,602,295)
Adjustments to Reconcile Net Loss to Net Cash Used in Operating Activities:           
Stock based compensation   12,722,805   3,880,250 
Loss on settlement of debt    316,521    - 
Write-oﬀ of inventory    6,979    - 
Amortization of debt discount    535,766   508,183 
            
Changes in assets and liabilities:           
Accounts receivable    -    - 
Inventory    195   (44,868)
Accounts payable and accrued expenses    360,465   367,836 
Accrued liabilities – related party    442,807    74,130 
Net Cash Used In Operating Activities   (1,325,862)  (1,766,764)
            
Cash Flows from Financing Activities:           
Net Cash Used in Investing Activities           
 Purchase of property and equipment   (101,350)   - 
Net Cash Used In Operating Activities   (101,350)   - 
            
Cash Flows from Financing Activities:           
Repayment to related parties   (505,762)  (161,135)
Proceeds from related parties    831,730   657,500 
Proceeds from issuance of common stock   1,130,696   1,255,750 
Net Cash Provided By Financing Activities   1,456,664   1,752,115 
            
Increase (decrease) in Cash and Cash Equivalents    29,452   (14,649)
Cash and Cash Equivalents - Beginning of period    16,624    31,273 
            
CASH AND CASH EQUIVALENTS - END OF PERIOD  $ 46,076  $ 16,624 
            
Supplemental cash ﬂow information:           
Cash paid for interest  $ -  $ - 
Cash paid for income taxes  $ -  $ - 
            
Schedule of Non-Cash Financing Activities:           
Cancellation of common stock  $ 22  $ - 
Forgiveness of related party debt  $ 32,395  $ - 
Common stock issued for notes payable and accrued liabilities – related party $ -  $205,000 
Common stock issued for debt  $ 549,567  $ - 
Debt discount related to beneﬁcial conversion feature  $ 909,565  $ - 
Accounts payable converted to convertible notes payable  $ 250,000  $ - 
Accounts payable and accrued liabilities – related party converted to
convertible notes payable – related party $ 258,750  $ - 
Accounts payable and accrued liabilities – related party converted to
convertible notes payable $ 100,000  $ - 
Convertible notes payable – related party converted to convertible notes
payable $ 198,778  $ - 
 
See notes to ﬁnancial statements.
 
 
F-5
 
 
UNITED HEALTH PRODUCTS, INC.
NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
FOR THE YEARS ENDED DECEMBER 31, 2020 AND 2019
 
Note 1. Description of the Business
 
United Health Products, Inc. (the “Company”) is a medical product development and solutions company
focusing on the wound-care industry. The Company produces an innovative hemostatic gauze product that
absorbs exudate (ﬂuids which have been discharged from blood vessels) by forming a gel-like substance upon
contact which supports and accelerates the blood coagulation process.  
 
Note 2. Signiﬁcant Accounting Policies
 
Going Concern
 
The accompanying ﬁnancial statements have been prepared assuming that the Company will continue
as a going concern. The Company has incurred recurring net losses, has negative working capital and
operations have not provided cash ﬂows. Additionally, the Company does not currently have suﬃcient revenue
producing operations to cover its operating expenses and meet its current obligations. In view of these matters,
there is substantial doubt about the Company’s ability to continue as a going concern. The Company intends to
ﬁnance its future development activities and its working capital needs largely through the sale of equity
securities with some additional funding from other sources, including term notes until such time as funds
provided by operations are suﬃcient to fund working capital requirements. The ﬁnancial statements of the
Company do not include any adjustments relating to the recoverability and classiﬁcation of recorded assets, or
the amounts and classiﬁcations of liabilities that might be necessary should the Company be unable to
continue as a going concern.
 
On March 11, 2020, the World Health Organization declared the outbreak of a coronavirus (COVID-19) as
a pandemic. As a result, economic uncertainties have arisen which have the potential to negatively impact the
Company’s ability to raise funding. Other factors that carry ﬁnancial implications for the Company could occur
although the potential impacts are unknown at this time.
 
Basis of Presentation
 
The Company prepares its ﬁnancial statements on the accrual basis of accounting in accordance with
accounting principles generally accepted in the United States of America.
 
Use of Estimates
 
The preparation of ﬁnancial statements in conformity with generally accepted accounting principles
requires the Company’s management to make estimates and assumptions that aﬀect the reported amounts of
assets and liabilities at the date of the ﬁnancial statements and the reported amounts of income and expenses
during the reported period. Changes in the economic environment, ﬁnancial markets, as well as in the
healthcare industry, and any other parameters used in determining these estimates, could cause actual results
to diﬀer.
 
Reclassiﬁcation
 
Certain account balances from prior periods have been reclassiﬁed in these ﬁnancial statements to
conform to current period classiﬁcations.
 
Cash and Cash Equivalents
 
The Company considers all highly liquid debt investments purchased with a maturity of three months or
less to be cash equivalents.
 
 
F-6
 
  
Fair Value Measurements
 
Accounting principles generally accepted in the United States deﬁne fair value as the exchange price
that would be received for an asset or paid to transfer a liability (an exit price) in the principal or most
advantageous market for the asset or liability in an orderly transaction between market participants at the
measurement date. Additionally, the inputs used to measure fair value are prioritized based on a three-level
hierarchy. This hierarchy requires entities to maximize the use of observable inputs and minimize the use of
unobservable inputs. The three levels of inputs used to measure fair value are as follows:
 
Level 1 — Quoted prices in active markets for identical assets or liabilities.
 
Level 2 — Observable inputs other than quoted prices included in Level 1. We value assets and liabilities
included in this level using dealer and broker quotations, bid prices, quoted prices for similar assets and
liabilities in active markets, or other inputs that are observable or can be corroborated by observable market
data.
 
Level 3 — Unobservable inputs that are supported by little or no market activity and that are signiﬁcant
to the fair value of the assets or liabilities. This includes certain pricing models, discounted cash ﬂow
methodologies and similar techniques that use signiﬁcant unobservable inputs.
 
Fair value estimates discussed herein are based upon certain market assumptions and pertinent
information available to management as of December 31, 2020 and 2019. The respective carrying value of
certain on-balance-sheet ﬁnancial instruments approximated their fair values due to the short-term nature of
these instruments.
 
Income Taxes
 
The Company accounts for income taxes using a method that requires recognition of deferred tax assets
and liabilities for expected future tax consequences of temporary diﬀerences that currently exist between tax
bases and ﬁnancial reporting bases of the Company’s assets and liabilities which is commonly known as the
asset and liability method. In assessing the ability to realize deferred tax assets, the Company considers
whether it is more likely than not that some portion or all of the deferred tax assets will not be realized.
 
The Company evaluates its tax positions taken or expected to be taken in the course of preparing the
Company’s tax returns to determine whether the tax positions are ‘‘more-likely-than-not’’ of being sustained
by the applicable tax authority. Tax positions not deemed to meet the “more-likely-than-not” threshold are
recorded as an expense in the applicable year. The Company does not have a liability for any unrecognized tax
beneﬁts. Management’s evaluation of uncertain tax positions may be subject to review and adjustment at a
later date based upon factors including, but not limited to, an on-going analysis of tax laws, regulations and
interpretations thereof, with due consideration given to the fact that tax periods are open to examination by
tax authorities.
 
As of December 31, 2020 and 2019, the Company has approximately $17.8 and $15.6 million of net
operating loss carry-forwards, respectively, available to aﬀect future taxable income and has established a
valuation allowance equal to the tax beneﬁt of the net operating loss carry forwards and temporary diﬀerences
as realization of the asset is not assured.
 
Revenue Recognition
 
The Company recognizes revenue in accordance with ASC 606, Revenue from Contracts with Customers.
Under ASC 606, the Company recognizes revenue from the sale of its HemoStyp product by applying the
following steps: (1) identify the contract with a customer; (2) identify the performance obligations in the
contract; (3) determine the transaction price; (4) allocate the transaction price to each performance obligation
in the contract; and (5) recognize revenue when each performance obligation is satisﬁed.
 
The Company receives orders for its HemoStyp products directly from its customers. Revenues are
recognized based on the agreed upon sales or transaction price with the customer when control of the promised
goods are transferred to the customer. The transfer of goods to the customer and satisfaction of the Company’s
performance obligation will occur either at the time when products are shipped or when the products arrive and
are received by the customer. No discounts were oﬀered by the Company. The Company does not provide an
estimate for returns as there is no anticipation for any returns in the normal course of business.
 
 
F-7
 
 
Trade Accounts Receivable and Concentration Risk
 
We record accounts receivable at the invoiced amount and we do not charge interest. We review the
accounts receivable by amounts due from customers which are past due, to identify speciﬁc customers with
known disputes or collectability issues. In determining the amount of the reserve, we make judgments about
the creditworthiness of signiﬁcant customers based on ongoing credit evaluations. We will also maintain a
sales allowance to reserve for potential credits issued to customers. We will determine the amount of the
reserve based on historical credits issued.
 
There was no provision for doubtful accounts recorded at December 31, 2020 and 2019. The Company
recorded $0 in bad debt expense for the years ended December 31, 2020 and 2019.
 
For the year ended December 31, 2020 one customer accounted for 100% of the Company’s net revenue.
 
For the year ended December 31, 2019 one customer accounted for 100% of the Company’s net revenue.
 
Inventory
 
Inventory is valued at the lower of cost or net realizable value using the ﬁrst-in, ﬁrst-out (FIFO) method.
Inventory on the balance sheet consists of raw materials purchased by the Company and ﬁnished goods.
 
   December
31,
2020  December
31,
2019 
Raw materials  $ 50,654  $ 54,774 
Finished goods    19,020    22,074 
   $ 69,674  $ 76,848 
 
During the years ended December 31, 2020 and 2019, the Company determined that $6,979 and $0,
needed to be impaired and written-oﬀ, respectively.
 
Advertising and Marketing Costs
 
Advertising and marketing costs are expensed as incurred. The Company incurred $206,572 and
$214,810 in advertising and marketing costs during the years ended December 31, 2020 and 2019, respectively.
 
Shipping and Handling Costs
 
The Company includes shipping and handling cost as part of cost of goods sold.
 
Research and Development
 
The Company charges research and development costs to expense when incurred. The Company
incurred $245,218 and $666,388 in research and development expenses during the years ended December 31,
2020 and 2019, respectively.
 
 
F-8
 
 
Stock Based Compensation
 
The Company accounts for share-based compensation under the provisions of ASC 718, Compensation-
Stock Compensation. Under the fair value recognition provisions, stock-based compensation expense is
measured at the fair value of the consideration received, or the fair value of the equity instruments issued, or
liabilities incurred, whichever is more reliably measured. Share-based compensation for all stock-based awards
to employees and directors is recognized as an expense over the requisite service period, which is generally
the vesting period.
 
The Company accounts for stock compensation arrangements with non-employees in accordance with
Accounting Standard Update (ASU) 2018-07, Compensation—Stock Compensation (Topic 718): Improvements to
Nonemployee Share-Based Payment Accounting, which requires that such equity instruments are recorded at
the value on the grant date.
  
Per Share Information
 
Basic earnings per share are calculated using the weighted average number of common shares
outstanding for the period presented. Diluted earnings per share is computed using the weighted-average
number of common shares and, if dilutive, potential common shares outstanding during the period. The dilutive
eﬀect of potential common shares is not reﬂected in diluted earnings per share because the Company incurred
a net loss for the years ended December 31, 2020 and 2019 and the eﬀect of including these potential common
shares in the net loss per share calculations would be anti-dilutive.
 
The total potential common shares as of December 31, 2020 include 59,330,000 of restricted stock units
and 1,867,500 shares of common stock for convertible notes payable – related party. The total potential
common shares as of December 31, 2019 include 50,350,000 of restricted stock units, and 579,556 shares for
convertible notes payable – related party.
 
Property and Equipment
 
Property and equipment are stated at cost. Depreciation is computed on the straight-line method. The
depreciation and amortization methods are designed to amortize the cost of the assets over their estimated
useful lives, in years, of the respective assets as follows:
 
Equipment  10 years
 
Maintenance and repairs are charged to expense as incurred. Improvements of a major nature are
capitalized. At the time of retirement or other disposition of property and equipment, the cost and accumulated
depreciation are removed from the accounts and any gains or losses are reﬂected in income.
 
New Accounting Pronouncements
 
                 In August 2020, the Financial Accounting Standards Board (“FASB”) issued Accounting Standards
Update (ASU) No. ASU 2020-06, Debt—Debt with Conversion and Other Options (Subtopic 470-20) and
Derivatives and Hedging—Contracts in Entity’s Own Equity (Subtopic 815-40): Accounting for Convertible
Instruments and Contracts in an Entity’s Own Equity, which simpliﬁes the accounting for certain ﬁnancial
instruments with characteristics of liabilities and equity, including convertible instruments and contracts on an
entity’s own equity.
 
                Under current GAAP, there are ﬁve accounting models for convertible debt instruments. ASU 2020-06
removes from U.S. GAAP the separation models for (1) convertible debt with a cash conversion feature and (2)
convertible instruments with a beneﬁcial conversion feature. As a result, after adopting the ASU’s guidance,
entities will not separately present in equity an embedded conversion feature in such debt. Instead, they will
account for a convertible debt instrument wholly as debt, and for convertible preferred stock wholly as
preferred stock (i.e., as a single unit of account), unless (1) a convertible instrument contains features that
require bifurcation as a derivative under ASC 815 or (2) a convertible debt instrument was issued at a
substantial premium. Additionally, for convertible debt instruments with substantial premiums accounted for as
paid-in capital, the FASB decided to add disclosures about (1) the fair value amount and the level of fair value
hierarchy of the entire instrument for public business entities and (2) the premium amount recorded as paid-in
capital.
 
 
F-9
 
 
ASU 2020-06 will be eﬀective for public business entities that meet the deﬁnition of a Securities and
Exchange Commission (SEC) ﬁler, excluding entities eligible to be smaller reporting companies as deﬁned by
the SEC, for ﬁscal years beginning after December 15, 2021, including interim periods within those ﬁscal years.
For all other entities, the amendments are eﬀective for ﬁscal years beginning after December 15, 2023,
including interim periods within those ﬁscal years. Early adoption is permitted, but no earlier than ﬁscal years
beginning after December 15, 2020, including interim periods within those ﬁscal years. The Company is
currently evaluating the potential impact of the adoption of this accounting pronouncement to its ﬁnancial
statements.
 
The Company considers all new pronouncements and management has determined that there have
been no other recently adopted or issued accounting standards that had or will have a material impact on its
ﬁnancial statements.
 
Note 3. Related Party Transactions
 
Related party convertible notes payables
 
As of December 31, 2020 and 2019, convertible notes payable – related parties totaled $456,032 and
$365,785, respectively. The amount of $365,785 as of December 31, 2019 was owed to Doug Beplate, the
former Chief Executive Oﬃcer and current Chairman of the Board, and was convertible at $0.65 per share, at
the sole discretion of Mr. Beplate.
 
                During the year ended December 31, 2019, Mr. Beplate advanced the Company a total of $657,500
and the Company made repayments to Mr. Beplate totaling $161,135. These loans were for operating expenses
of the Company, are due on demand and have no interest rate.
 
On April 22, 2019, the Company agreed to allow Mr. Beplate to convert all previous outstanding cash
loans made to the Company. For any outstanding loans made on or before April 15, 2019, the loans are
convertible at $0.50 per share and for all loans subsequent to April 15, 2019, the amounts are convertible at
$0.65 per share, in each case at the sole discretion of Mr. Beplate. The Company’s stock price on April 22, 2019
was $0.90 which resulted in a beneﬁcial conversion feature of $193,137 which was recorded to interest
expense – related party.
 
During the year ended December 31, 2019, Mr. Beplate converted $205,000 of notes payable at a
conversion price of $0.50 into 410,000 shares of common stock.
 
From the April 15, 2019 through December 31, 2019, Mr. Beplate loaned the Company $490,500 which
was convertible at $0.65 as mentioned above. These loans resulted in a beneﬁcial conversion feature of
$315,046 which was recorded to interest expense upon issuance during the year ended December 31, 2019.
The outstanding balance of these convertible notes payable – related party was $365,785 as of December 31,
2019 and the remaining unamortized debt discount was $0.
 
During the year ended December 31, 2020, Mr. Beplate loaned the Company $251,730 which was
convertible at $0.65. These loans resulted in a beneﬁcial conversion feature of $83,156 which was recorded to
interest expense – related party upon issuance. The Company made repayments to Mr. Beplate totaling
$505,765, $87,750 was assigned to the Company’s legal counsel and $24,000 was forgiven during the year
ended December 31, 2020, leaving a balance of $0 owed to Mr. Beplate as of December 31, 2020. These loans
were for operating expenses of the Company, due on demand and had no interest rate.
 
During the year ended December 31, 2020, Brian Thom, the Chief Executive Oﬃcer loaned the Company
$450,000 and also converted $105,000 of accrued compensation into a convertible note. The note and loans are
convertible at $0.50 per share at the discretion of the Mr. Thom, have a maturity date of March 31, 2021 and
have an interest rate of 3%. The loans resulted in a beneﬁcial conversion feature totaling $338,105 which was
recorded as a debt discount. The debt discount is being amortized through the maturity dates and $138,792
was amortized to interest expense – related party during the year ended December 31, 2020. As of December
31, 2020, the total outstanding balance of the note and loans is $555,000 and the remaining unamortized debt
discount is $199,313.
 
During the year ended December 31, 2020, Louis Schiliro, the Chief Operating Oﬃcer loaned the
Company $130,000 and also converted $150,000 of accrued compensation into a convertible note. The note
and loans are convertible at $0.50 per share at the discretion of Mr. Schiliro, have a maturity date of March 31,
2021 and have an interest rate of 3%. During the year ended December 31, 2020, $110,000 of the convertible
note payable along with $1,028 of accrued interest was assigned to the Company’s legal counsel leaving a
total outstanding balance of the note and loans of $170,000. The loans and note resulted in a beneﬁcial
conversion feature totaling $174,985 which was recorded as a debt discount. The debt discount is being
amortized through the maturity dates and $105,331 was amortized to interest expense – related party during
the year ended December 31, 2020. The remaining unamortized debt discount is $69,654.
 
 
F-10
 
 
During the year ended December 31, 2020, Kristofer Heaton, the Vice President of Finance, converted
$3,750 of accrued compensation into a convertible loan. The loan is convertible at $0.50 per share at the
discretion of Mr. Heaton, has a maturity date of March 31, 2021 and has an interest rate of 3%. This note
resulted in a beneﬁcial conversion feature totaling $3,750 which was recorded as a debt discount. The debt
discount is being amortized through the maturity date and $0 was amortized to interest expense – related party
during the year ended December 31, 2020. The remaining unamortized debt discount is $3,750.
 
 Interest expense on the above convertible notes was $8,925 along with $327,278 of debt discount
amortization for total interest expense – related party of $336,203 during the year ended December 31, 2020.
Interest expense – related party was $0 during the year ended December 31, 2019. Total accrued interest –
related party was $7,503 and $0 as of December 31, 2020 and 2019, respectively.
 
Accrued liabilities
 
As of December 31, 2020 and 2019, $0 and $77,130 was owed to Mr. Beplate, respectively, for accrued
compensation. During the year ended December 31, 2020, $188,375 was paid to Mr. Beplate, $100,000 of
accrued compensation was converted to a convertible note payable and then assigned to the Company’s legal
counsel and $8,395 of accrued compensation was forgiven. The note was convertible at $0.50 per share at the
discretion of the note holder, had a maturity date of March 31, 2021 and had an interest rate of 3%. The note
resulted in a beneﬁcial conversion feature totaling $100,000 which was recognized into interest expense.
 
As of December 31, 2020 and 2019, $66,600 and $24,100 was owed to Nate Knight, who was the Chief
Financial Oﬃcer until November 2020, for accrued compensation, respectively. During the year ended
December 31, 2020 $42,500 of compensation was accrued and $12,500 was paid. As of December 31, 2020 and
2019, Mr. Knight was also owed $7,456 for reimbursable expenses.
 
As of December 31, 2020 and 2019, $0 and $0 was owed to Brian Thom, the Chief Executive Oﬃcer, for
accrued compensation, respectively. During the year ended December 31, 2020, $105,000 of compensation was
converted into a convertible loan as mentioned above.
 
As of December 31, 2020 and 2019, $0 and $0 was owed to Louis Schiliro, the Chief Operating Oﬃcer, for
accrued compensation, respectively. During the year ended December 31, 2020, $150,000 of compensation was
converted into a convertible loan as mentioned above and $30,000 was paid. As of December 31, 2020 and
2019, Mr. Schiliro was also owed $59,467 and $0 for reimbursable expenses, respectively.
 
 As of December 31, 2020 and 2019, $0 and $0 was owed to Kristofer Heaton, the Vice President of
Finance, for accrued compensation, respectively. During the year ended December 31, 2020, $3,750 of
compensation was converted into a convertible loan as mentioned above. As of December 31, 2020 and 2019,
Mr. Heaton was also owed $52,625 and $0 for prior services provided to the Company, respectively.
 
As of December 31, 2020 and 2019, $45,000 and $60,000 was paid to the oﬃce administrator, who is a
person aﬃliated with the Company’s former CEO, for compensation, respectively. As of December 31, 2020 and
2019, $0 and $10,330 was owed for reimbursable expenses, respectively.
 
Equity transactions
 
During the year ended December 31, 2019, 1,600,000 shares to Nate Knight who was the Chief Financial
Oﬃcer of the Company until November 2020, 500,000 shares to the oﬃce administrator, who is a person
aﬃliated with the Company’s former CEO and 50,000 shares to a Technical Product Supervisor, who is the son
of the oﬃce administrator, all of which were held in escrow as of December 31, 2018 became vested as
modiﬁed by the Board of Directors for services provided. Per ASC 718-20-35, the change in vesting conditions
resulted in a modiﬁcation of the stock-based compensation awards. The modiﬁcation is considered a Type III
modiﬁcation as described in ASC 718-20-55 and resulted in recording $2,021,000 of stock-based compensation
expense which was the fair value of the shares on the date of the modiﬁcation.
 
In March 2019, the Company granted Mr. Beplate and Louis Schiliro 33,000,000 and 8,000,000 Restricted
Stock Units (RSU’s), respectively, which vest and are issuable upon the achievement of certain conditions
described in Note 6. These RSU’s were included as part of the Company’s grant of an aggregate of 50,100,000
RSUs to various oﬃcers, directors and consultants which all vest on substantially the same terms. The RSUs
granted to Mr. Beplate replaced an executive compensation stock bonus package that was granted to Mr.
Beplate in December 2018 which had provided that upon the sale of all or substantially all of the assets of the
Company or other change in control or merger transaction in which the Company is involved, or in the event
that no such transaction occurred by December 31, 2019, Mr. Beplate would have been entitled to receive a
number of shares equal to 15% post issuance of the then outstanding shares of the Company’s common stock
on a fully diluted basis. The December 2018 executive compensation stock bonus package had, in turn,
replaced a previously issued 5% stock bonus granted to Mr. Beplate that would have been issuable in the event
of a sale of the Company’s assets or change in control or merger transaction, per his services agreement. The
8,000,000 RSU’s granted to Mr. Schiliro replaced 5,000,000 shares of common stock which were previously held
in escrow and subsequently cancelled. See “Note 6” regarding the granting of the RSUs.
 
 
F-11
 
  
During the year ended December 31, 2019, the Company issued a total of 1,000,000 shares of common
stock to directors and oﬃcers of the Company and 50,000 shares of common stock to the oﬃce administrator,
who is a person aﬃliated with the Company’s former CEO and 50,000 shares to a Technical Product Supervisor,
who is the son of the oﬃce administrator for services rendered. The shares had a fair market value of
$1,063,000.
 
On July 21, 2020 the Board of Directors approved amendments to the RSU Agreement put in place on
March 25, 2019. The approved amendments increased the amount of RSU’s granted to Mr. Beplate from
33,000,000 to 33,800,000, increased the amount of RSU’s granted to Mr. Schiliro from 8,000,000 to 10,000,000,
increased the amount of RSU’s granted to Mr. Heaton from 50,000 to 500,000, increased the amount of RSU’s
granted to the oﬃce administrator, who is a person aﬃliated with the Company’s CEO from 250,000 to 500,000
and increased the amount of RSU’s granted to the Technical Product Supervisor, who is the son of the oﬃce
administrator from 250,000 to 500,000.
 
The July 21 amendment also changed the vesting terms so that 15% of RSUs vested on July 15, 2020, an
additional 15% of RSU units upon FDA approval of a PMA Class III awarded to the Company, an additional 20%
of RSU units on January 1, 2021 and the balance of all unvested RSU units on the earliest date that (a) the
Company achieves $20 million in gross cumulative sales commencing as of January 1, 2020, (b) a Covered
Transaction is consummated or (c) a Trigger Event occurs. Each Grantee has the option to delay the Vesting
Date of all or part of his RSUs until no later than an event described in (b) or (c) above, by serving written
notice to the Company prior to such Vesting Date.
 
The change in vesting terms resulted in a total of 6,795,000 of the RSU’s vesting on July 15, 2020 with
5,070,00 being issued to Mr. Beplate, 1,500,000 being issued to Mr. Schiliro, 75,000 being issued to Mr. Heaton,
75,000 being issued to the oﬃce administrator, who is a person aﬃliated with the Company’s CEO and 75,000
being issued to the Technical Product Supervisor, who is the son of the oﬃce administrator. The change in
vesting terms also resulted in a total of 50,000 of the RSU’s vesting on July 20, 2020 with 50,000 being issued
to the Marketing and Advertising Supervisor, who is the daughter of the oﬃce administrator. The vesting of the
6,845,000 RSU’s resulted in stock-based compensation expense of $4,859,950 which is the fair value of the
stock on the vesting date.
 
The oﬃce administrator resigned during the year and forfeited 425,000 of the remaining unvested RSU’s
with a value of $70,567.
 
 In November 2020, the Company granted Mr. Thom 11,500,000 RSU’s which subject to certain
conditions, shall vest upon the achievement of certain Company objectives and milestones.
 
In December 2020, the Company entered into a second restricted stock unit agreement with Mr. Heaton.
The second agreement issued an additional 1,000,000 RSU’s, 500,000 of which were granted on the award date
and 500,000 of which will be granted on May 15, 2021 provided his professional services agreement is in eﬀect
on that date. The RSUs, subject to certain conditions, shall vest upon the achievement of certain Company
objectives and milestones. 
 
During the year ended December 31, 2020, the Company issued a total of 125,000 shares of restricted
common stock to Mr. Thom, prior to becoming Chief Executive Oﬃcer, for services rendered. The shares had a
fair market value of $100,625.
 
Note 4. Convertible Notes
 
 During the year ended December 31, 2020, certain service providers and a medical advisor converted
$205,000 of accrued compensation into convertible notes. The notes are convertible at $0.50 per share at the
discretion of the note holders, have a maturity date of March 31, 2021 and have an interest rate of 3%. As of
December 31, 2020, the convertible loans have a principal balance of $205,000 and the balance on the loans
net of the debt discount is $103,920
 
During the year ended December 31, 2020, the Company’s legal counsel was assigned $298,778 worth
of loans after paying various outstanding balances on behalf of the Company. In addition, the Company’s legal
counsel converted $45,000 of accrued fees into a convertible note payable. The note was convertible at $0.50
per share at the discretion of the note holder, had a maturity date of March 31, 2021 and had an interest rate of
3%. The note resulted in a beneﬁcial conversion feature totaling $45,000 which was recorded as a debt
discount, to be amortized through its maturity date. The Company’s legal counsel converted all of the
convertible loans into 557,056 shares of common stock in accordance with the original conversion features of
the notes, therefore no gain or loss on debt settlement was recognized and the total debt discount of $45,000
was recognized into interest expense. As of December 31, 2020, no amounts were owing to the Company’s
legal counsel related to these transactions.
 
Interest expense was $1,537 and $0 during the years ended December 31, 2020 and 2019, respectively,
and the entire amount has been accrued.
 
 
F-12
 
 
Note 5. Property and Equipment
 
As of December 31, 2020 and December 31, 2019, the balance of property and equipment represented
consisted of the followings:
 
   December
31,  December
31, 
   2020  2019 
Equipment (not placed in service)  $101,350  $ - 
Accumulated depreciation    -    - 
   $101,350  $ - 
 
The equipment has not yet been placed in service and therefore depreciation expense for the year
ended December 31, 2020 and 2019 was $0 and $0, respectively.
 
During the year ended December 31, 2020 and 2019, the Company acquired property and equipment of
$101,350 and $0, respectively.
 
Note 6. Issuances of Securities
 
Share issuances 2019
 
During 2019, 1,622,199 shares of common stock were sold to non-aﬃliated investors in a private
placement for total cash proceeds of $1,055,750: 400,000 shares of common stock were sold to securities
counsel for total cash proceeds of $200,000: 350,000 shares of common stock were issued to securities counsel
for services rendered with a fair value of $335,500: 1,100,000 shares of common stock were issued to oﬃcers
and directors of the Company for services rendered with a fair value of $1,063,000: 50,000 shares of common
stock to the oﬃce administrator, who is a person aﬃliated with the Company’s CEO, for services rendered with
a fair value of $48,500: 425,000 shares of common stock were issued to various consultants and advisors for
services rendered with a fair value of $412,250: and 410,000 shares of common stock were issued to the
Company’s former CEO for conversion of notes payable totaling $205,000. 
 
During the year ended December 31, 2019, the previously disclosed 2,150,000 shares that were awarded
in 2018 (see Note 3 above) and reported as issued and outstanding with no related expense recognized as of
December 31, 2018, were modiﬁed by the Board of Directors and deemed vested. The modiﬁcation resulted in
recording $2,021,000 of stock-based compensation expense which was the fair value of the shares on the date
of the modiﬁcation.
 
Share issuances 2020
 
During the year ended December 31, 2020, 2,000,500 shares of common stock were sold to non-
aﬃliated investors in a private placement for total cash proceeds of $1,130,696, 50,000 shares of common
stock were issued to a former medical advisor for services rendered with a fair value of $47,500, 250,000
shares of common stock were issued to a consultant for services rendered with a fair value of $153,750,
125,000 shares of common stock were issued to Mr. Thom, prior to becoming Chief Executive Oﬃcer, for
services rendered with a fair value of $100,625, 1,058,634 shares of common stock with a fair value of
$866,482 were issued for debt which resulted in a loss on debt settlement of $316,915 and 22,381 shares of
common stock were cancelled.
 
Restricted stock units
 
On March 25, 2019, the Board approved Restricted Stock Unit Agreements (“RSU Agreements”) with
certain of its oﬃcers, directors and consultants representing an aggregate of 50,350,000 shares of common
stock to be issued and delivered to such persons upon the earlier of (i) a change in control of the Company by a
cash tender oﬀer, merger, acquisition or otherwise or (ii) the Company achieving quarterly gross revenue that,
when annualized, represents gross annual revenues of at least $20,000,000 by December 31, 2019, or (iii) the
commencement of an action or event by a third party without the Board’s approval to eﬀect, or seek to eﬀect, a
change in control of the Company or change in the Company’s management.
 
 
F-13
 
 
As discussed in Note 3, the Board of Directors approved amendments to these RSU agreements on
March 25, 2019 for certain management and consultants to the Company. The amendments increased the total
amount of RSU’s granted from 50,350,000 to 55,350,000. The amendments also changed the vesting conditions
which resulted in 7,595,000 of the RSU’s vesting on July 15, 2020 and 50,000 of the RSU’s vesting on July 20,
2020. Per ASC 718-20-35, the change in vesting conditions resulted in a modiﬁcation of the stock-based
compensation awards. The modiﬁcation is considered a Type III modiﬁcation as described in ASC 718-20-55 and
resulted in recording $5,392,450 of stock-based compensation expense which was the fair value of the shares
on the date of the modiﬁcation.
 
In addition, the amendment resulted in 10,060,000 of the RSU’s vesting on January 1, 2021. As
mentioned in Note 3, the oﬃce administrator subsequently resigned and 425,000 of unvested RSU’s were
forfeited which left a total of 9,635,000 of RSU’s vesting on January 1, 2021. The fair value of the 9,635,000
RSU’s on the date of the amendment was $7,071,600. The compensation expense is being amortized on a
straight-line basis from the date of the amendment through January 1, 2021 which is the vesting date. Stock-
based compensation of $7,028,480 was recognized as expense during the year ended December 31, 2020
leaving total unrecognized compensation cost of $43,120.
 
As discussed in Note 3, Mr. Thom was granted 11,500,000 RSU’s and Mr. Heaton was granted 500,000
RSU’s. The vesting conditions are contingent upon the achievement of certain Company objectives and
milestones which the management is unable to determine when they will be achieved.
 
Management is unable to determine if and when FDA approval of a PMA Class III will be awarded to the
Company or when a change of control will occur, if at all, and as of December 31, 2020, there was a total of
$41,895,820 unrecognized compensation cost related to the restricted stock unit awards.
 
Activity related to our restricted stock units during the year ended December 31, 2019 was as follows:
 
   
Number of
Units  Weighted
Average
Grant
Date Fair
Value 
Total awards outstanding at December 31, 2018    -  $ - 
Units granted   50,350,000  $ 0.94 
Units Exercised/Released    -  $ - 
Units Cancelled/Forfeited    -  $ - 
Total awards outstanding at December 31, 2019   50,350,000  $ 0.94 
 
Activity related to our restricted stock units during the year ended December 31, 2020 was as follows:
 
   
Number of
Units  Weighted
Average
Grant
Date Fair
Value 
Total awards outstanding at December 31, 2019   50,350,000  $ 0.94 
Units granted   62,350,000  $ 0.80 
Units Exercised/Released   (7,595,000) $ 0.71 
Units Cancelled/Forfeited   (45,775,000) $ 0.94 
Total awards outstanding at December 31, 2020   59,330,000  $ 0.82 
 
 
F-14
 
 
Note 7. Litigation
 
A Complaint was ﬁled with the United States District Court, Southern District of New York by Steven
Safran as Plaintiﬀ against the Company and Douglas Beplate, its CEO, as Defendant. This case was transferred
to the United States District Court in Las Vegas, Nevada. Mr. Safran is seeking damages and monies allegedly
owed pursuant to an employment agreement of approximately $734,000 and allegedly unpaid loans of
$245,824 provided to Defendants. The Company has denied Plaintiﬀ’s allegations and intends to vigorously
defend this lawsuit. The parties have held various depositions and the Company made a motion to dismiss
which was denied. The Plaintiﬀ ﬁled a motion to amend his complaint and the Company has submitted
opposition papers and we are awaiting an order from the Court.
  
In March 2021, the Company received payment of $304,273 from Maxim Group LLC, representing the full
settlement payment in accordance with a Settlement Agreement in a previously disclosed arbitration between
the Company and Maxim that was settled in December 2019.  
 
Philip Forman, who served in positions as Chairman, a director, Chief Executive Oﬃcer and Chief Medical
Advisor at various time between 2011 and October 2015, ﬁled a lawsuit against the Company and our Chief
Executive Oﬃcer, Douglas Beplate, in the United States District Court of the District of Nevada. The claimant
has claimed, among other things, that: the June 25, 2015 Amendment to his November 10, 2014 Employment
Agreement with the Company, which terminated the Employment Agreement on October 1, 2015, is not valid
because of lack of consideration; that a July 22, 2015 Stock Purchase Agreement pursuant to which the
claimant sold Company shares issued to him under the Amendment to a third a party is unenforceable (despite
the fact that all payment for the shares under the Stock Purchase Agreement was made); that the plaintiﬀ’s
2014 Employment Agreement is enforceable and that he is entitled to cash and stock compensation under that
Employment Agreement (without giving regard to the Amendment); that if the Amendment is enforceable, he is
entitled to the shares issued under the Amendment (without mention that those shares were sold to a third
party under the Stock Purchase Agreement described above); and that the Company and Mr. Beplate defrauded
the plaintiﬀ relating to the foregoing. The plaintiﬀ is seeking declaratory judgment regarding the parties’
relative rights under the Employment Agreement, the Amendment and the Stock Purchase Agreement; money
damages of no less than $2,795,000; and punitive damages of $8,280,000. The Company believes that it has
meritorious defenses to the matters claimed as well as counterclaims against the claimant. The Company ﬁled
a motion to dismiss the plaintiﬀ’s claims which was denied on March 19, 2020. Discovery is now taking place.
  
FSR Inc. commenced a lawsuit in 2018 against Korsair Holdings A.G. in the U.S. District Court for the
Southern District of New York, seeking among other claims for relief, rescission of the transfer of 3,050,000
shares of United Health Products that FSR sold to Korsair in 2011. Third-Party Plaintiﬀ, JEC Consulting
Associates, LLC as Liquidator of LeadDog Capital L.P., Intervenor (“Intervenor”) in the above matter, ﬁled a
third-party complaint against United Health Products, and Douglas Beplate alleging among other things that the
Company and Mr. Beplate refused to have the Rule 144 restrictive legend removed from the Korsair certiﬁcate
held by JEC, and concomitantly fraudulently deprive JEC as Liquidator of LeadDog of the ability to sell the
Shares in the open market, knowingly, intentionally and directly causing economic harm to LeadDog Capital
L.P. Intervenor as Third Party Plaintiﬀ further alleges that the Company and Mr. Beplate as Third-Party
Defendants are not only monetarily liable to Third-Party Plaintiﬀ for compensatory damages of $2,500,000 but
should be made to pay exemplary damages in an amount determined by the Court, but not less than an equal
amount - $2,500,000. Third-Party Plaintiﬀ demands judgment for the above referenced amounts and for the
Court to also declare that the 3,050,000 shares are free trading; that Third-Party Plaintiﬀ’s rights to 2.5 million
of the Shares are superior to the claims of Plaintiﬀ FSR; that Plaintiﬀ FSR has no claim to 2.5 million of the
3,050,000 Shares reﬂected by the Korsair certiﬁcate; that the Company and Mr. Beplate are to instruct its
current transfer agent to remove the restrictive legend on the Korsair certiﬁcate for the Shares; and an order
directing the Company and Mr. Beplate to instruct the Company’s transfer agent to exchange the Korsair
certiﬁcate for new free-trading, unrestricted certiﬁcates. The Company believes that it had legal right to decline
to instruct the transfer agent to remove the restrictive legend from the Korsair Shares where the ownership of
the aforementioned shares have been in dispute and the Korsair shares have not been submitted for transfer to
its transfer agent in proper form under the uniform commercial code. The Court granted the motion for a
default by FSR, Inc against Korsair Holdings, AG., but denied any claim for relief against UHP. The Court ruled
that the SEC must review the claim before the matter can proceed in Court.
  
Due to uncertainties inherent in litigation, we cannot predict the outcome of the above legal
proceedings.
 
 
F-15
 
 
 In 2020 the Company commenced the following legal proceeding:
 
On February 7, 2020, the Company ﬁled the Original Petition for Fraud and Breach of Contract in the
Texas District Court for the 215th Judicial District of Harris County against defendants Patterson Companies Inc.,
Patterson Management, L.P., Patterson Veterinary, Inc. and Patterson Logistics Services, Inc., and Animal Health
International, Inc. On March 5, 2020, the defendants removed the case to U.S. District Court for Southern
District of Texas. The defendants ﬁled their answer in federal court on March 12, 2020. The original August 25,
2020 pretrial deadlines were extended and we expect the case to be trial ready by the end of 2021.
 
The defendants ﬁled a Motion for Summary Judgment which was denied by the court on March 11, 2021.
  
In August 2020, United Health Products ﬁled suit against its former auditors, Haynie & Company, in Utah
State Court, asserting claims related to professional negligence and breach of ﬁduciary duty. Haynie &
Company has denied the allegations. The parties are conducting discovery.
 
Note 8. Income Tax
 
The Company accounts for income taxes under the Financial Accounting Standards Board (“FASB”)
Accounting Standards Codiﬁcation (“ASC”) No. 740, Income Taxes (“ASC 740”). Under ASC 740, deferred tax
assets and liabilities are recognized for the future tax consequences attributable to diﬀerences between the
ﬁnancial statement carrying amounts of existing assets and liabilities and their respective tax bases. Deferred
tax assets and liabilities are measured using enacted tax rates expected to apply to taxable income in the
years in which those temporary diﬀerences are expected to be recovered or settled. Under ASC 740, the eﬀect
on deferred tax assets and liabilities of a change in tax rates is recognized in income in the period that includes
the enactment date. 
 
The Company did not take any uncertain tax positions and had no adjustments to its income tax
liabilities or beneﬁts pursuant to the provisions of Section 740-10-25 for the years ended December 31, 2020
and 2019.The Company recognizes interest accrued related to unrecognized tax beneﬁts in interest expense
and penalties in operating expenses. No such interest or penalties were recognized during the period
presented. The Company had no accruals for interest and penalties at December 31, 2020 or 2019.
 
The Company’s federal income tax returns for the years ended December 31, 2017 through December
31, 2020 remain subject to examination by the Internal Revenue Service as of December 31, 2020.
 
During 2020 and 2019, the Company incurred net losses and, therefore, has no tax liability. The net
deferred tax asset generated by the loss carry-forward has been fully reserved.
 
 
F-16
 
 
Net deferred tax assets consist of the following components as of December 31, 2020 and 2019
 
   2020  2019 
Deferred tax assets:         
Net operating loss carryover  $3,735,500  $3,282,100 
Accrued related party payroll    (6,200)   21,700 
Valuation allowance   (3,729,300)  (3,303,800)
Net deferred tax asset  $ -  $ - 
         
   2020  2019 
Book income  $(3,299,400) $(1,386,500)
Related party accrued payroll    (6,200)   15,500 
(Gain) Loss on debt settlement    66,500    - 
Stock based compensation   2,671,800   814,900 
Interest amortization   112,500   106,700 
Inventory write-oﬀ    1,500    - 
Valuation allowance   453,300   449,400 
Income tax expense  $ -  $ - 
 
As of December 31, 2020 and 2019, the Company has taxable net loss carryovers of approximately
$17.8 and $15.6 million, respectively, that may be oﬀset against future taxable income for the years 2021
through 2040.
 
Note 9. Subsequent Events
 
The Company has evaluated events from December 31, 2020, through the date whereupon the ﬁnancial
statements were issued and has determined that there are no material events that need to be disclosed,
except as follows:
 
The Board of Directors approved the second amendment to the Restricted Stock Unit Agreement
between the Company and its former Chief Executive Oﬃcer and current Chairman of the Board, Douglas
Beplate in conjunction with Mr. Beplate’s retirement from his day-to-day management role with the Company.
The amendment accelerated the vesting and immediately settled his remaining Restricted Stock Units
(“RSUs”) in a total of 28,730,000 restricted shares. Further, as a bonus in recognition of Mr. Beplate’s service to
the Company and in recruitment of new executive management, the Company agreed to issue to Mr. Beplate
an additional 2,000,000 restricted shares of common stock.
 
The Company issued to various oﬃcers/director and other persons providing services to the Company, a
total of 3,200,000 shares of common stock, in settlement of the scheduled vesting of RSU’s that were originally
issued in March 2019 and vested on January 1, 2021. Of the 3,200,000 shares of common stock, 2,000,000
shares were issued to Louis Schiliro, Chief Operating Oﬃcer/director, and 100,000 shares were issued to
Kristofer Heaton, our Principal Financial Oﬃcer.
 
 
F-17
 
 
The Company’s legal counsel was assigned a total amount of $175,000 which were all convertible notes
– related party. The convertible note was convertible at $0.50 per share and the Company’s legal counsel
converted the $175,000 into 350,000 shares of common stock.
 
Mr. Schiliro, the Chief Operating Oﬃcer, advanced the Company $20,000 to pay for operating expenses.
The advance is due on demand and non-interest bearing.
 
The Company issued a total of $115,000 in convertible notes to two unaﬃliated individuals. The notes
are convertible at $0.85 per share have a maturity date of June 30, 2021 and has an interest rate of 3%. One
note in the amount of $85,000 was converted into 100,000 shares of common stock.
 
One holder of a convertible note with a balance of $101,161, which included principal and accrued
interest, converted the entire amount into 202,322 shares of common stock.
 
The Company issued 100,000 shares of common stock for settlement of a business consulting
agreement. The shares had a fair market value of $111,000.
 
The Company cancelled 117,647 shares of common stock.
 
The Company issued 78,500 shares of common stock to Nate Knight, the former Chief Financial Oﬃcer,
for amounts owed related to accrued compensation and reimbursable expenses.
 
 
F-18
 
 
ITEM 9. CHANGES IN AND DISAGREEMENTS WITH ACCOUNTANTS ON ACCOUNTING AND
FINANCIAL DISCLOSURE
 
None 
 
ITEM 9A. CONTROLS AND PROCEDURES
 
Evaluation of Disclosure Controls and Procedures
 
The Company needs to implement disclosure controls and procedures (as deﬁned in Rules 13a-15(e) and
15d-15(e) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (the ‘‘Exchange Act’’), that are designed to ensure that
information required to be disclosed in the Company’s Exchange Act reports are recorded, processed,
summarized, and reported within the time periods speciﬁed in the rules and forms of the Securities and
Exchange Commission, and that such information is accumulated and communicated to our Chief Executive
Oﬃcer and Chief Financial Oﬃcer to allow timely decisions regarding required disclosure.
 
As of December 31, 2020, the Chief Executive Oﬃcer and Chief Financial Oﬃcer carried out an
assessment, of the eﬀectiveness of the design and operation of our disclosure controls and procedures
pursuant to Exchange Act Rules 13a-15(b) and 15d-15(b). As of the date of this assessment, the Chief Executive
Oﬃcer and Chief Financial Oﬃcer concluded that the Company’s disclosure controls and procedures were not
eﬀective as of December 31, 2020.
 
Management’s Report on Internal Control over Financial Reporting
 
Management of the Company is responsible for establishing and maintaining adequate internal control
over ﬁnancial reporting, as such term is deﬁned in Rules 13a-15(f) and 15d-15(f) under the Exchange Act. The
Company’s internal control over ﬁnancial reporting is a process designed to provide reasonable assurance
regarding the reliability of ﬁnancial reporting and the preparation of ﬁnancial statements for external reporting
purposes in accordance with accounting principles generally accepted in the United States of America. Internal
control over ﬁnancial reporting includes those policies and procedures that (i) pertain to the maintenance of
records that, in reasonable detail, accurately and fairly reﬂect the transactions and dispositions of the assets of
the Company; (ii) provide reasonable assurance that transactions are recorded as necessary to permit
preparation of ﬁnancial statements in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles, and that
receipts and expenditures of the Company are being made only in accordance with authorizations of
management and directors of the Company; and (iii) provide reasonable assurance regarding prevention or
timely detection of unauthorized acquisition, use, or disposition of the Company’s assets that could have a
material eﬀect on the interim or annual ﬁnancial statements.
 
Because of its inherent limitations, internal control over ﬁnancial reporting may not prevent or detect
misstatements. Also, projections of any evaluation of eﬀectiveness to future periods are subject to the risk that
controls may become inadequate because of changes in conditions, or that the degree of compliance with
policies or procedures may deteriorate.
 
The Chief Executive Oﬃcer and Chief Financial Oﬃcer assessed the eﬀectiveness of the Company’s
internal control over ﬁnancial reporting as of December 31, 2020. In performing its assessment of the
eﬀectiveness of the Company’s internal control over ﬁnancial reporting, management applied the criteria
described in the Internal Control-Integrated Framework issued by the Committee of Sponsoring Organizations of
the Treadway Commission (‘‘COSO - 2013’’).
 
A material weakness is a deﬁciency, or a combination of deﬁciencies, in internal control over ﬁnancial
reporting, such that there is a reasonable possibility that a material misstatement of the Company’s annual or
interim ﬁnancial statements will not be prevented or detected on a timely basis.
 
 
19
 
 
The material weaknesses identiﬁed during management’s assessment were the following:
 
 •Inadequate corporate governance
    
 •Inadequate internal control structure and control environment
    
 •Lack of information technology controls
    
 •Lack of segregation of duties
    
 •Lack of suﬃcient accounting resources with SEC experience, US generally accepted accounting
principles knowledge and tax accounting expertise
 
These material weaknesses could result in a material misstatement of signiﬁcant accounts or
disclosures that would result in a material misstatement to the Company’s interim or annual ﬁnancial
statements that would not be prevented or detected.
 
Because of the material weaknesses, management concluded that the Company did not maintain
eﬀective internal control over ﬁnancial reporting as of December 31, 2020, based on the criteria in Internal
Control-Integrated Framework issued by COSO -2013.
 
Changes in Internal Control over Financial Reporting
 
There were no reported changes in internal control over ﬁnancial reporting for the year ended December
31, 2020.
 
ITEM 9B. OTHER INFORMATION
 
None.
 
 
20
 
 
PART III
 
ITEM 10. DIRECTORS, EXECUTIVE OFFICERS, AND CORPORATE GOVERNANCE
 
Directors and Executive Oﬃcers
 
Our directors and executive oﬃcers as of the ﬁling date of this Form 10-K are as follows:
 
Name  Age  Position with Company  
Douglas K. Beplate  65  Chairman of the Board and Director  
Brian Thom   55  Chief Executive Oﬃcer and Director  
Louis Schiliro   50  Chief Operating Oﬃcer, Secretary, Treasurer and Director  
Kristofer Heaton   42  Vice President of Finance and Principal Financial Oﬃcer  
Robert Denser   49  Director  
 
Our directors hold oﬃce for one-year terms and until their successors have been elected and qualiﬁed.
Our oﬃcers are appointed annually and serve at the discretion of the Board.
 
Douglas K. Beplate has been Chairman of the Board since 2015 and was our Chief Executive Oﬃcer
from November 2014 through November 2020. He has also been a Director since November 2014. Mr. Beplate
has been working on the development and marketing of Hemostyp gauze since 2010. From 1996 to 2007, Mr.
Beplate was founder and President of Emergency Filtration Products, Inc. (EFP) where his responsibilities
included product design, research and development, patent work and production. During his time at EFP, Mr.
Beplate was awarded a grant through California State University San Bernardino for development of
nanotechnology for the U.S. government and military sector. Prior to his position at EFP he was a consultant to
various medical products ﬁrms from where he was involved in research and development, and product design.
 
Brian Thom was appointed as Chief Executive Oﬃcer eﬀective December 1, 2020 and joined our Board
as a Director on January 1, 2021. Mr. Thom has served as a consultant to the Company since April 2020
overseeing ﬁnance and business development activities and has served as external ﬁnancial advisor to the
Company since 2018. He brings over 20 years of corporate ﬁnance experience and a successful track record of
helping fast growing companies across a broad range of industries to raise capital and create shareholder
value. Over the course of his career he spent a decade with JPMorgan’s global Mergers and Acquisitions group
and ﬁve years leading the Americas Corporate Finance group with Société Générale, a multi-national European
investment bank, among other entrepreneurial pursuits.
 
Louis Schiliro has served as our Chief Operating Oﬃcer since August 2018 and was appointed to the
Board as a Director eﬀective December 1 2020, Mr. Schiliro has been responsible for all day-to-day operations
for manufacturing, packaging and marketing of Hemostyp gauze for the Company. He has acted as the
coordinator and liaison for all Federal regulatory interactions including with the FDA through our Class III PMA
application process. Previously, Mr. Schiliro served as Chief Operating Oﬃcer of Hemo Manufacturing from
January 2014 through December 2016, where he was responsible for all day-to-day operations for
manufacturing, packaging and marketing of Hemostyp Gauze as a contract vendor to the Company. He was
integral in developing new SKUs and packaging setups. From January 2012 through January 2014, Mr. Schiliro
was a Partner at ETL Response Inc. (“ETL”). ETL works in the medical device and homeland security ﬁelds and is
dedicated to speciﬁc projects by oﬀering clients a full cycle solution. From 1997 through January 2012, Mr.
Schiliro served as Chief Operating Oﬃcer and Chief Financial Oﬃcer of Global Protection USA and Global
Medical. Global Protection was a market leader in distributing protective equipment to America’s ﬁrst
responders. Global Medical was a distributor of medical supplies and products to surgical centers in New Jersey.
 
 
21
 
 
Kristofer Heaton was brought on as the Vice President of Finance and Principal Financial Oﬃcer during
2020. Mr. Heaton is a CPA designation and began his career in commercial banking with a bank in Salt Lake City
in 2004. In 2006, he moved to public accounting and gained experience in various industries while working for
various ﬁrms. Mr. Heaton founded his own accounting ﬁrm in 2015 which specializes in audits of public
companies and has provided non-audit accounting and administrative services to the Company since 2017.
 
Robert J. Denser has served as a Director of the Company since November 2014. Over the past 10
years his main focus has been to assist federal and state agencies, ﬁrst responders, EMS agencies and
hospitals with their planning and procurement of the necessary medical equipment needed to be adequately
prepared for any type of natural or man-made disaster. This includes working with the Medical Directors and
their teams from the State of California and Los Angeles County with the development and fulﬁllment of a $60
million project that will give hospitals the caches of medical equipment needed to properly respond to the
surge of patients that will result from a disaster. For the past ﬁve years Mr. Denser has been a member of ETL
Response, LLC and has been in the role of Director of Sales and Finance. In this role he coordinates all ETL
projects as needed. ETL Response. Mr. Denser’s background experience also includes direct access to key
decision makers within the VA hospital system, as well as federal and private disaster response agencies, like
FEMA and the Red Cross, that are on the front lines of any disaster.
 
Directors’ and Oﬃcers’ Liability Insurance
 
We are currently seeking to obtain directors’ and oﬃcers’ liability insurance against any liability for acts
or omissions in their capacities as directors or oﬃcers, subject to certain exclusions. Such insurance also would
insure us against losses which we may incur in indemnifying our oﬃcers and directors. In addition, we may
enter into indemniﬁcation agreements with key oﬃcers and directors and such persons shall also have
indemniﬁcation rights under applicable laws, and our certiﬁcate of incorporation and bylaws.
 
Corporate Governance
 
Our business, property and aﬀairs are managed by, or under the direction of, our Board, in accordance
with the General Corporation Law of the State of Nevada and our By-Laws. Members of the Board are kept
informed of our business through discussions with the Chief Executive Oﬃcer and other key members of
management, by reviewing materials provided to them by management.
 
We continue to review our corporate governance policies and practices by comparing our policies and
practices with those suggested by various groups or authorities active in evaluating or setting best practices for
corporate governance of public companies. Based on this review, we have adopted, and will continue to adopt,
changes that the Board believes are the appropriate corporate governance policies and practices for our
Company. We have adopted changes and will continue to adopt changes, as appropriate, to comply with the
Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002 and subsequent rule changes made by the SEC and any applicable securities
exchange.
 
Director Qualiﬁcations and Diversity
 
The Board seeks independent directors who represent a diversity of backgrounds and experiences that
will enhance the quality of the board’s deliberations and decisions. Candidates shall have substantial
experience with one or more publicly traded companies or shall have achieved a high level of distinction in
their chosen ﬁelds. The Board is particularly interested in maintaining a mix that includes individuals who are
active or retired executive oﬃcers and senior executives, particularly those with experience in the medical
device and health care industries.
 
In evaluating Director candidates, our Board also looks for certain personal attributes, such as integrity,
ability and willingness to apply sound and independent business judgment, comprehensive understanding of a
director’s role in corporate governance, availability for meetings and consultation on Company matters, and
the willingness to assume and carry out ﬁduciary responsibilities. Qualiﬁed candidates for membership on the
Board will be considered without regard to race, color, religion, sex, ancestry, national origin or disability.
 
 
22
 
  
Risk Oversight
 
Enterprise risks are identiﬁed and prioritized by management and each prioritized risk is assigned to the
full board for oversight. These risks include, without limitation, the following:
 
 •Risks and exposures associated with strategic, ﬁnancial and execution risks and other current
matters that may present material risk to our operations, plans, prospects or reputation.
    
 •Risks and exposures associated with ﬁnancial matters, particularly ﬁnancial reporting, tax,
accounting, disclosure, internal control over ﬁnancial reporting, ﬁnancial policies, investment
guidelines and credit and liquidity matters.
    
 •Risks and exposures relating to corporate governance; and management and director succession
planning.
    
 •Risks and exposures associated with leadership assessment, and compensation programs and
arrangements, including incentive plans.
 
Board Leadership Structure
 
In accordance with the Company’s By-Laws, the Chairman of the Board presides at all meetings of the
Board. Mr. Beplate currently holds the position of Chairman of the Board and Mr. Thom holds the position of
Chief Executive Oﬃcer. The Company has no ﬁxed policy with respect to the separation of the oﬃces of the
Chairman of the Board and Chief Executive Oﬃcer.
 
Code of Ethics
 
We have adopted a Code of Ethics within the meaning of Item 406(b) of Regulation S-K of the Exchange
Act. This Code of Ethics applies to our directors and senior oﬃcers, such as the principal executive oﬃcer,
principal ﬁnancial oﬃcer and persons performing similar functions. Our Code of Ethics is available as Exhibit 14
to our Annual Report on Form 10-K ﬁled April 16, 2010.
 
Committees
 
As of the ﬁling date of this Form 10-K, the Board of Directors has no committees. Mr. Beplate and Mr.
Denser may be deemed an independent directors of the Company as that term is deﬁned under the Exchange
Act of 1934, as amended. Mr. Denser is not deemed to be a ﬁnancial expert. The term “Financial Expert” is
deﬁned under the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002, as amended, as a person who has the following attributes: an
understanding of generally accepted accounting principles and ﬁnancial statements; has the ability to assess
the general application of such principles in connection with the accounting for estimates, accruals and
reserves; experience preparing, auditing, analyzing or evaluating ﬁnancial statements that present a breadth
and level of complexity of accounting issues that are generally comparable to the breadth and complexity of
issues that can reasonably be expected to be raised by the company’s ﬁnancial statements, or experience
actively supervising one or more persons engaged in such activities; an understanding of internal controls and
procedures for ﬁnancial reporting; and an understanding of audit committee functions.
  
 
23
 
 
Communications with the Board of Directors
 
Stockholders may communicate with the Board of Directors by sending a letter to United Health
Products, Inc. Board of Directors, c/o our securities counsel, Ruskin Moscou Faltischek, PC, East Tower 15th Floor,
1425 RXR Plaza, Uniondale, New York 11556. Our securities counsel will receive the correspondence and
forward it to the Chairman or to any individual director or directors to whom the communication is directed,
unless the communication is unduly hostile, threatening or illegal, does not reasonably relate to the Company
or its business, or is similarly inappropriate. The Chairman of the Board has the authority to discard or
disregard any inappropriate communications or to take other appropriate actions with respect to any such
inappropriate communications.
 
Medical Advisory Board
 
As the Company continues to pursue its FDA application to have HemoStyp approved for Class III
surgical uses in the United States and abroad, it has formed a Medical Advisory Board which consists of the
following persons as of the date of this ﬁling:
 
Gerard Abate, MD Former Executive Director, Medical Aﬀairs for Fortune 500 company Quest Diagnostics,
where he directed 80+ Medical Aﬀairs group that includes 8 clinical franchise medical directors, (oncology,
genetics, women’s health, cardiovascular-metabolism, neurology, infectious disease/inﬂammation), HEOR
team, publications group, MSLs, genetic counselors and project management.
 
Michael Erik Jessen MD Professor and Chairman, and Frank M. Ryburn, Jr. Distinguished Chair in
Cardiothoracic Surgery and Transplantation, Department of Cardiovascular and Thoracic Surgery, University of
Texas Southwestern Medical Center.
 
Richard Massoth, DDS, MSD received his specialty training in Endodontics and his Master of Science in
Dentistry from Boston University in 1982. He has been an Adjunct Professor at the UCLA School of Dentistry
and has been in clinical practice for 36 years. Dr. Massoth has been a published author and a symposium
speaker on “Endodontic Microsurgery” and “The Use of Cone Beam CT Scans in Endodontic Diagnosis.”
 
David Ramey, DVM brings thirty-ﬁve years of clinical experience as a full-time veterinarian, specializing in
the care of performance and pleasure horses. He has written and published thirteen books, ﬁve book chapters,
and over seventy papers in professional journals. Dr. Ramey is a frequent speaker on various veterinary topics
at universities, conventions, and continuing education seminars around the United States, as well as Canada,
Australia, and the UK.
 
 
24
 
  
ITEM 11. EXECUTIVE COMPENSATION
 
The following table sets forth the overall compensation earned over the ﬁscal years ended December
31, 2020 and 2019 by (1) each person who served as the principal executive oﬃcer of the Company during
ﬁscal year 2020; (2) our most highly compensated (up to a maximum of two) executive oﬃcers as of December
31, 2020 with compensation during ﬁscal year ended 2020 of $100,000 or more; and (3) those individuals, if
any, who would have otherwise been included in section (2) above but for the fact that they were not serving
as an executive of us as of December 31, 2020.
 
   Fiscal
Year Salary
($)  Bonus
($)  Stock
Awards
($)(1) (4)  Options
Awards
($)(1)  Non-Equity
Incentive Plan
Compensation
($)  Non-qualiﬁed
Deferred
Compensation
Earnings ($)  All Other
Compensation
($)(2)(3)  
Total ($)
                                   
Douglas
Beplate 2020 $220,000  $-0-  $3,599,700  $ -0-  $ -0-  $ -0-  $ -0-  $3,819,700
Former
Chief
Executive
Oﬃcer 2019 
$240,000  
$-0-  
$388,000  
$ -0-  
$ -0-  
$ -0-  
$ -0-  
$628,000
                                           
Brian
Thom
Chief
Executive
Oﬃcer
since
November
2020 
2020 
$105,000  
$-0-  
$100,625  
$ -0-  
$ -0-  
$ -0-  
$ -0-  
$205,625
                                           
Nate
Knight 2020 $55,000  $-0-  $ 0  $ -0-  $ -0-  $ -0-  $ -0-  $55,000
Former
Chief
Financial
Oﬃcer 2019 
$60,000  
$-0-  
$1,696,000  
$ -0-  
$ -0-  
$ -0-  
$ -0-  
$1,756,000
                                           
Kristofer
Heaton
Principal
Financial
Oﬃcer
since
December
2020 
2020 
$3,750  
$-0-  
$53,250  
$ -0-  
$ -0-  
$ -0-  
$ -0-  
$57,000
                                           
Louis
Schiliro 2020 $180,000  $-0-  $1,065,000  $ -0-  $ -0-  $ -0-  $ -0-  $1,245,000
Chief
Operating
Oﬃcer 2019 
$181,500  
$-0-  
$194,000  
$ -0-  
$ -0-  
$ -0-  
$ -0-  
$375,500
_____________
(1)FASB ASC Topic 718 requires the company to determine the overall full grant date fair value of the restricted
stock awards and options as of the date of grant based upon the Black-Scholes method of valuation which
total amounts are set forth in the table above under the year of grant, and to then expense that value over
the service period over which the restricted stock awards and options become vested. As a general rule, for
time-in-service-based restricted stock awards and options, the company will immediately expense any
restricted stock awards and option or portion thereof which is vested upon grant, while expensing the
balance on a pro rata basis over the remaining vesting term of the restricted stock awards and options. For
a description FASB ASC Topic 718 and the assumptions used in determining the value of the restricted stock
awards and options under the Black-Scholes model of valuation, see the notes to the ﬁnancial statements
included with this Form 10-K.
 
(2)Includes all other compensation not reported in the preceding columns, including (i) perquisites and other
personal beneﬁts, or property, unless the aggregate amount of such compensation is less than $10,000; (ii)
any “gross-ups” or other amounts reimbursed during the ﬁscal year for the payment of taxes; (iii) discounts
from market price with respect to securities purchased from the company except to the extent available
generally to all security holders or to all salaried employees; (iv) any amounts paid or accrued in connection
with any termination (including without limitation through retirement, resignation, severance or
constructive termination, including change of responsibilities) or change in control; (v) contributions to
vested and unvested deﬁned contribution plans; (vi) any insurance premiums paid by, or on behalf of, the
company relating to life insurance for the beneﬁt of the named executive oﬃcer; and (vii) any dividends or
other earnings paid on stock or option awards that are not factored into the grant date fair value required to
be reported in a preceding column.
 
(3)Includes compensation for service as a director described under Director Compensation, below.
 
(4) The Company issued RSU’s which vest according to certain performance conditions as discussed in the
ﬁnancial statements. The grant date fair value of the RSU’s granted assuming all performance conditions
are met would be $23,998,000 for Doug Beplate; $13,570,000 for Brian Thom; $7,100,000 for Lou Schiliro
and $955,000 for Kristofer Heaton.
   
 
25
 
 
For a description of the material terms of each named executive oﬃcers’ compensation arrangements,
including the terms of any contract, agreement, plan or other arrangement that provides for any payment to a
named executive oﬃcer in connection with his or her resignation, retirement or other termination, or a change
in control of the company see section below entitled “Compensation Arrangements.”
 
No outstanding common share purchase option or other equity-based award granted to or held by any
named executive oﬃcer were repriced or otherwise materially modiﬁed, including extension of exercise
periods, the change of vesting or forfeiture conditions, the change or elimination of applicable performance
criteria, or the change of the bases upon which returns are determined, nor was there any waiver or
modiﬁcation of any speciﬁed performance target, goal or condition to payout, other than as described below.
 
Stock Awards – Restricted Stock Units
 
In March 2019, restricted stock unit awards were granted to Douglas Beplate (33,000,000 shares), Louis
Schiliro (8,000,000 shares), four non-aﬃliated persons (8,550,000 shares), Wendy Harper, our oﬃce
administrator shares (250,000 shares), our Technical Product Supervisor and our Internet Commerce Supervisor.
The latter two supervisors are Ms. Harper’s children who received restricted stock units for an aggregate of
300,000 shares. These restricted stock unit awards vest upon the earlier of (i) a change in control of the
Company by a cash tender oﬀer, merger, acquisition or otherwise, or (ii) the Company achieving $20,000,000 in
gross revenues on a go forward basis, or (iii) the commencement of an event by a third party without the
Board’s approval to eﬀect, or seek to eﬀect, a change in control of the Company or the Company’s
management in accordance with the terms of the restricted stock unit awards. This compensation arrangement
was also in lieu of Mr. Beplate’s bonus arrangement described herein and in replacement of our obligation to
issue 5 million shares to Mr. Schiliro pursuant to his Services Agreement.
 
On July 21, 2020 the Board of Directors approved amendments to the March 2019 RSU Agreement
mentioned above. The approved amendments increased the amount of RSU’s granted to Mr. Beplate from
33,000,000 to 33,800,000, increased the amount of RSU’s granted to Mr. Schiliro from 8,000,000 to 10,000,000,
increased the amount of RSU’s granted to Mr. Heaton from 50,000 to 500,000, increased the amount of RSU’s
granted to the oﬃce administrator, who is a person aﬃliated with the Company’s CEO from 250,000 to 500,000
and increased the amount of RSU’s granted to the Technical Product Supervisor, who is the son of the oﬃce
administrator from 250,000 to 500,000.
 
The July 21 amendment also changed the vesting terms so that 15% of RSUs vested on July 15, 2020, an
additional 15% of RSU units upon FDA approval of a PMA Class III awarded to the Company, an additional 20%
of RSU units on January 1, 2021 and the balance of all unvested RSU units on the earliest date that (a) the
Company achieves $20 million in gross cumulative sales commencing as of January 1, 2020, (b) a Covered
Transaction is consummated or (c) a Trigger Event occurs. Each Grantee has the option to delay the Vesting
Date of all or part of his RSUs until no later than an event described in (b) or (c) above, by serving written
notice to the Company prior to such Vesting Date.
 
The change in vesting terms resulted in a total of 6,795,000 of the RSU’s vesting on July 15, 2020 with
5,070,00 being issued to Mr. Beplate, 1,500,000 being issued to Mr. Schiliro, 75,000 being issued to Mr. Heaton,
75,000 being issued to the oﬃce administrator, who is a person aﬃliated with the Company’s CEO and 75,000
being issued to the Technical Product Supervisor, who is the son of the oﬃce administrator. The change in
vesting terms also resulted in a total of 50,000 of the RSU’s vesting on July 20, 2020 with 50,000 being issued
to the Marketing and Advertising Supervisor, who is the daughter of the oﬃce administrator.
 
 In November 2020, the Company granted Mr. Thom 11,500,000 restricted stock units which, subject to
certain conditions, shall vest upon the achievement of certain Company objectives and milestones.     
 
In December 2020, the Company entered into a second restricted stock unit agreement with Mr. Heaton.
The second agreement issued an additional 1,000,000 RSU’s, 500,000 of which were granted on the award date
and 500,000 of which will be granted on May 15, 2021 provided his professional services agreement is in eﬀect
on that date. The RSUs, subject to certain conditions, shall vest upon the achievement of certain Company
objectives and milestones. 
 
Compensation Agreements
 
Messers Thom, Schiliro and Heaton are being compensated at the monthly rate of $15,000, $15,000 and
$7,500, respectively, pursuant to services agreements entered with each of them.
 
 
 
26
 
  
OUTSTANDING EQUITY AWARDS AT FISCAL YEAR END
 
The following table sets forth all outstanding equity awards held by our named executive oﬃcers as of
December 31, 2020.
 
    Option Awards    Stock Awards  
Name Number of
Securities
Underlying
Unexercised
Options (#)
Exercisable  Number of
Securities
Underlying
Unexercised
Options (#)
Unexercisable  
Option
Exercise
Price
($)  
Option
Expiration
Date  Number of
Shares or
Units That
Have Not
Vested
(#)  Market
Value of
Shares
or Units
of Stock
That
Have Not
Vested(1)
($) 
Doug Beplate,    —    —  $ —    —   28,730,000  $ 0.71 
Former CEO                               
                                
Brian Thom,    —    —  $ —    —   11,500,000  $ 1.18 
CEO                               
                                
Lou Schiliro,    —    —  $ —    —   8,500,000  $ 0.71 
COO                               
                                
Kristofer Heaton,    —    —  $ —    —           
Principal Financial Oﬃcer                      425,000  $ 0.71 
                        500,000  $ 1.20 
_____________
(1)Market value is based on the stock price on the day the Restricted Stock Unit agreement or amendment was
entered into.
 
DIRECTOR COMPENSATION
 
The following table sets forth certain information concerning the compensation paid to our directors not named
as an executive oﬃcer in this Item 11 above for services rendered to us during the ﬁscal year ended December
31, 2020.
 
Name Fees
Earned or
Paid in
Cash
($)  
Stock
Awards  
Option
Awards  
Total 
Robert Denser  $ —  $ —  $ —  $ — 
 
 Cash Fees and Options
 
Currently the Company has no audit, compensation, corporate governance, nominating or other
committee of the Board of Directors, although it intends to establish an audit, compensation and corporate
governance committee in the future as part of the process to achieve a full exchange listing. No cash fees have
been paid to board members for serving on the board.
 
 
27
 
 
Travel Expenses
 
All directors are entitled to be reimbursed for their reasonable out of pocket expenses associated with
attending director and shareholder meetings in person.
 
Review of Risks Arising from Compensation Policies and Practices
 
We have reviewed our compensation policies and practices for all employees and concluded that any
risks arising from our policies and practices are not reasonably likely to have a material adverse eﬀect on the
Company.
 
ITEM 12. SECURITY OWNERSHIP OF CERTAIN BENEFICIAL OWNERS AND MANAGEMENT AND
RELATED STOCKHOLDER MATTERS.
 
As of March 12, 2021, the Company had 224,117,912 shares of Common Stock outstanding. The only
persons of record who presently hold or are known to own (or believed by the Company to own) beneﬁcially
more than 5% of the outstanding shares of such class of stock are listed below. The following table also sets
forth certain information as to holdings of the Company’s Common Stock of all oﬃcers and directors
individually, and all oﬃcers and directors as a group.
 
Name and Address of Beneﬁcial Owner (1)
Oﬃcers and Directors: Number of
Common
Shares  
Percentage 
Douglas K. Beplate (2)   35,305,142    15.8%
Brian Thom   125,000   * 
Robert Denser   1,550,000   * 
Kristofer Heaton   405,000   * 
Louis Schiliro   3,330,000    1.5 
All directors and oﬃcers as a group (four persons)   40,715,142    18.2%
___________
*Represents less than 1%
(1)
 
 Beneﬁcial ownership is determined in accordance with Rule 13d-3 under the Securities Exchange Act of
1934, as amended, and is generally determined by voting powers and/or investment powers with respect to
securities. Unless otherwise noted, all of such shares of common stock listed above are owned of record by
each individual named as beneﬁcial owner and such individual has sole voting and dispositive power with
respect to the shares of common stock owned by each of them. Such person or entity’s percentage of
ownership is determined by assuming that any options or convertible securities held by such person or
entity, which are exercisable within sixty (60) days from the date hereof, have been exercised or converted
as the case may be, but not for the purposes of determining the number of outstanding shares held by any
other named beneﬁcial owner. All addresses are c/o United Health Products, Inc., 10624 S. Eastern Ave., Ste.
A209, Henderson, NV 89052.
(2)Excludes 137,307 shares owned by his spouse.
 
Stock Bonuses
 
In November 2019 a total of 1,325,000 shares were issued to certain employees under the 2019 Plan (as
described below). Of these, 400,000 were issued to Mr. Beplate, 200,000 were issued to Mr. Schiliro, 100,000
were issued to Mr. Knight and 100,000 were issued to Robert Denser, and Independent Director of the Company.
 
 
28
 
 
Securities Authorized for Issuance under Equity Compensation Plans.
  
                On August 8, 2013, the Board of Directors approved the 2013 Employee Beneﬁt and Consulting
Services Compensation Plan (the “2013 Plan”) which had 15,000,000 shares that may be issued under said
Plan. The 2013 Plan provides for the direct issuance of shares of common stock and the granting of non-
statutory stock options on terms established by the Board of Directors or committee thereof. While the Plan
provides for incentive stock options, no incentive stock options may be granted under the Plan since no
stockholder approval was obtained on or before August 8, 2014. In September 2013, the Company issued
6,000,000 shares of stock under the 2013 Plan to Douglas Beplate pursuant to his consulting agreement then in
eﬀect. No other shares or options have been granted under the 2013 Plan. There are currently 9,000,000 of
shares available for issuance under this 2013 Plan. 
  
On October 30, 2019, the Board of Directors approved the 2019 Employee Beneﬁt and Consulting
Services Compensation Plan (the “2019 Plan”) which has 2,000,000 shares that may be issued under said Plan.
The 2019 Plan provides for the direct issuance of shares of common stock and the granting of non-statutory
stock options or incentive stock options on terms established by the Board of Directors or committee thereof.
The Plan has not been approved by the Company’s stockholders. The Company approved the issuance of
1,525,000 shares in November 2019 to certain consultants, Oﬃcers and Directors. The Company has not issued
any options under this 2019 Plan.
  
Separate from the 2013 Plan and 2019 Plan, the Board of Directors has approved individual Restricted
Stock Unit Agreements with certain consultants, Oﬃcers and Directors which represented an aggregate of
49,550,000 and 15,250,000 in 2019 and 2020, respectively, which upon vesting will result in the issuance of
common shares. These include RSUs issued to Oﬃcers and Directors as follows:
  
In March 2019, Mr. Beplate was granted 33,000,000 RSUs, Mr. Schiliro was granted 8,000,000 RSUs and
Mr. Heaton was granted 50,000 RSUs. In July 2020, Mr. Beplate was granted an additional 800,000 RSUs, Mr.
Schiliro was granted an additional 2,000,000 RSUs, Mr. Heaton was granted an additional 950,000 RSUs. In
December 2020, Mr. Thom was granted 11,500,000 RSUs.
 
In July 2020, 15% of the RSU’s vested with 5,070,00 being issued to Mr. Beplate, 1,500,000 being issued
to Mr. Schiliro and 75,000 being issued to Mr. Heaton,
 
On January 1, 2021, 20% of the RSU’s granted to Mr. Beplate which totaled 6,760,000 vested, 20% of the
RSU’s granted to Mr. Schiliro which totaled 2,000,000 vested and 20% of the RSU’s granted to Mr. Heaton which
totaled 100,000 vested.
 
In January 2021, the Board of Directors approved the second amendment to the Restricted Stock Unit
Agreement between the Company and its former Chief Executive Oﬃcer and current Chairman of the Board,
Douglas Beplate in conjunction with Mr. Beplate’s retirement from his day-to-day management role with the
Company. The amendment accelerated the vesting and immediately settled his remaining Restricted Stock
Units (“RSUs”) in a total of 28,730,000 restricted shares. Further, as a bonus in recognition of Mr. Beplate’s
service to the Company and in recruitment of new executive management, the Company agreed to issue to Mr.
Beplate an additional 2,000,000 million restricted shares of common stock.
 
 
29
 
 
ITEM 13. CERTAIN RELATIONSHIPS AND RELATED TRANSACTIONS, AND DIRECTOR INDEPENDENCE
 
Related party convertible notes payables
 
As of December 31, 2020 and 2019, convertible notes payable – related parties totaled $456,032 and
$365,785, respectively. The amount of $365,785 payable as of December 31, 2019 was owed to Mr. Beplate,
and was convertible at $0.65 per share, at the sole discretion of Mr. Beplate.
  
                During the year ended December 31, 2019, Mr. Beplate advanced the Company a total of $657,500
and the Company made repayments to Mr. Beplate totaling $161,135. These loans were for operating expenses
of the Company, are due on demand and have no interest rate.
 
On April 22, 2019, the Company agreed to allow Mr. Beplate to convert all previous outstanding cash
loans made to the Company into Company common stock. For any outstanding loans made on or before April
15, 2019, the loans are convertible at $0.50 per share and for all loans subsequent to April 15, 2019, the
amounts are convertible at $0.65 per share, in each case at the sole discretion of Mr. Beplate. The Company’s
stock price on April 22, 2019 was $0.90 which resulted in a beneﬁcial conversion feature of $193,137 which was
recorded to interest expense.
 
During the year ended December 31, 2019, Mr. Beplate converted $205,000 of notes payable at a
conversion price of $0.50 into 410,000 shares of common stock.
 
From the April 15, 2019 through December 31, 2019, Mr. Beplate loaned the Company $490,500 which
was convertible at $0.65 as mentioned above. These loans resulted in a beneﬁcial conversion feature of
$315,046 which was recorded to interest expense upon issuance during the year ended December 31, 2019.
The outstanding balance of these convertible notes payable – related party was $365,785 as of December 31,
2019 and the remaining unamortized debt discount was $0.
 
During the year ended December 31, 2020, Mr. Beplate loaned the Company $251,730 which was
convertible at $0.65. These loans resulted in a beneﬁcial conversion feature of $83,156 which was recorded to
interest expense – related party upon issuance. The Company made repayments to Mr. Beplate totaling
$505,765, $87,750 was assigned to the Company’s legal counsel and $24,000 was forgiven during the year
ended December 31, 2020, leaving a balance of $0 owed to Mr. Beplate as of December 31, 2020. These loans
were for operating expenses of the Company, due on demand and had no interest rate.
 
During the year ended December 31, 2020, Brian Thom, the Chief Executive Oﬃcer loaned the Company
$450,000 and also converted $105,000 of accrued compensation into a convertible note. The note and loans are
convertible at $0.50 per share at the discretion of the Mr. Thom, have a maturity date of March 31, 2021 and
have an interest rate of 3%. The loans resulted in a beneﬁcial conversion feature totaling $338,105 which was
recorded as a debt discount. The debt discount is being amortized through the maturity dates and $138,792
was amortized to interest expense – related party during the year ended December 31, 2020. As of December
31, 2020 the total outstanding balance of the note and loans is $555,000 and the remaining unamortized debt
discount is $199,313.
 
During the year ended December 31, 2020, Louis Schiliro, the Chief Operating Oﬃcer loaned the
Company $130,000 and also converted $150,000 of accrued compensation into a convertible note. The note
and loans are convertible at $0.50 per share at the discretion of Mr. Schiliro, has a maturity date of March 31,
2021 and have an interest rate of 3%. During the year ended December 31, 2020, $110,000 of the convertible
note payable along with $1,028 of accrued interest was assigned to the Company’s legal counsel leaving a
total outstanding balance of the note and loans of $170,000. The loans and note resulted in a beneﬁcial
conversion feature totaling $174,985 which was recorded as a debt discount. The debt discount is being
amortized through the maturity dates and $105,331 was amortized to interest expense – related party during
the year ended December 31, 2020. The remaining unamortized debt discount is $69,654.
 
 
30
 
 
During the year ended December 31, 2020, Kristofer Heaton, the Vice President of Finance, converted
$3,750 of accrued compensation into a convertible loan. The loan is convertible at $0.50 per share at the
discretion of Mr. Heaton, has a maturity date of March 31, 2021 and has an interest rate of 3%. This note
resulted in a beneﬁcial conversion feature totaling $3,750 which was recorded as a debt discount. The debt
discount is being amortized through the maturity date and $0 was amortized to interest expense – related party
during the year ended December 31, 2020. The remaining unamortized debt discount is $3,750.
 
 Interest expense on the above convertible notes was $8,925 along with $327,278 of debt discount
amortization for total interest expense – related party of $336,203 during the year ended December 31, 2020.
Interest expense – related party was $0 during the year ended December 31, 2019. Total accrued interest –
related party was $7,258 and $0 as of December 31, 2020 and 2019, respectively.
 
Accrued liabilities
 
As of December 31, 2020 and 2019, $0 and $77,130 was owed to Mr. Beplate, respectively, for accrued
compensation. During the year ended December 31, 2020, $188,375 was paid to Mr. Beplate, $100,000 of
accrued compensation was converted to a convertible note payable and then assigned to the Company’s legal
counsel and $8,395 of accrued compensation was forgiven. The note was convertible at $0.50 per share at the
discretion of the note holder, had a maturity date of March 31, 2021 and had an interest rate of 3%. The note
resulted in a beneﬁcial conversion feature totaling $100,000 which was recognized into interest expense.
  
As of December 31, 2020 and 2019, $66,600 and $24,100 was owed to Nate Knight, the former Chief
Financial Oﬃcer, for accrued compensation, respectively. During the year ended December 31, 2020 $42,500 of
compensation was accrued and $12,500 was paid. As of December 31, 2020 and 2019, Mr. Knight was also
owed $7,456 for reimbursable expenses.
 
As of December 31, 2020 and 2019, $0 and $0 was owed to Brian Thom, the Chief Executive Oﬃcer, for
accrued compensation, respectively. During the year ended December 31, 2020, $105,000 of compensation was
converted into a convertible loan as mentioned above.
 
As of December 31, 2020 and 2019, $0 and $0 was owed to Louis Schiliro, the Chief Operating Oﬃcer, for
accrued compensation, respectively. During the year ended December 31, 2020, $150,000 of compensation was
converted into a convertible loan as mentioned above and $30,000 was paid. As of December 31, 2020 and
2019, Mr. Schiliro was also owed $59,467 and $0 for reimbursable expenses, respectively.
 
 As of December 31, 2020 and 2019, $0 and $0 was owed to Kristofer Heaton, the Vice President of
Finance, for accrued compensation, respectively. During the year ended December 31, 2020, $3,750 of
compensation was converted into a convertible loan as mentioned above. As of December 31, 2020 and 2019,
Mr. Heaton was also owed $52,625 and $0 for prior services provided to the Company, respectively.
 
As of December 31, 2020 and 2019, $0 and $10,330 was owed for reimbursable expenses, respectively.
to the oﬃce administrator, who is a person aﬃliated with the Company’s former CEO, for compensation,
respectively.
 
Equity transactions
 
During the year ended December 31, 2019, 1,600,000 shares were issued to Nate Knight who is the
former Chief Financial Oﬃcer of the Company until November 2020, 500,000 shares to the oﬃce administrator,
who is a person aﬃliated with the Company’s former CEO and 50,000 shares to a Technical Product Supervisor,
who is the son of the oﬃce administrator, all of which were held in escrow as of December 31, 2018 became
vested as modiﬁed by the Board of Directors for services provided. Per ASC 718-20-35, the change in vesting
conditions resulted in a modiﬁcation of the stock-based compensation awards. The modiﬁcation is considered a
Type III modiﬁcation as described in ASC 718-20-55 and resulted in recording $2,021,000 of stock-based
compensation expense which was the fair value of the shares on the date of the modiﬁcation.
  
In March 2019, the Company granted Mr. Beplate and Louis Schiliro 33,000,000 and 8,000,000 Restricted
Stock Units (RSU’s), respectively, which vest and are issuable upon the achievement of certain conditions
described in Item 11 Executive Compensation -- Stock Awards under the heading Restricted Stock Units. These
RSU’s were included as part of the Company’s grant of an aggregate of 50,100,000 RSUs to various oﬃcers,
directors and consultants which all vest on substantially the same terms. The RSUs granted to Mr. Beplate
replaced an executive compensation stock bonus package that was granted to Mr. Beplate in December 2018
which had provided that upon the sale of all or substantially all of the assets of the Company or other change in
control or merger transaction in which the Company is involved, or in the event that no such transaction
occurred by December 31, 2019, Mr. Beplate would have been entitled to receive a number of shares equal to
15% post issuance of the then outstanding shares of the Company’s common stock on a fully diluted basis. The
December 2018 executive compensation stock bonus package had, in turn, replaced a previously issued 5%
stock bonus granted to Mr. Beplate that would have been issuable in the event of a sale of the Company’s
assets or change in control or merger transaction, per his services agreement. The 8,000,000 RSU’s granted to
Mr. Schiliro replaced 5,000,000 shares of common stock which were previously held in escrow and
subsequently cancelled. See “Note 6” regarding the granting of the RSUs.
  
 
31
 
 
During the year ended December 31, 2019, the Company issued a total of 1,000,000 shares of common
stock to directors and oﬃcers of the Company and 50,000 shares of common stock to the oﬃce administrator,
who is a person aﬃliated with the Company’s CEO and 50,000 shares to a Technical Product Supervisor, who is
the son of the oﬃce administrator for services rendered. The shares had a fair market value of $1,063,000.
 
On July 21, 2020 the Board of Directors approved amendments to the RSU Agreement put in place on
March 25, 2019. The approved amendments increased the amount of RSU’s granted to Mr. Beplate from
33,000,000 to 33,800,000, increased the amount of RSU’s granted to Mr. Schiliro from 8,000,000 to 10,000,000,
increased the amount of RSU’s granted to Mr. Heaton from 50,000 to 500,000, increased the amount of RSU’s
granted to the oﬃce administrator, who is a person aﬃliated with the Company’s CEO from 250,000 to 500,000
and increased the amount of RSU’s granted to the Technical Product Supervisor, who is the son of the oﬃce
administrator from 250,000 to 500,000.
 
The oﬃce administrator resigned during the year and forfeited 425,000 of the remaining unvested RSU’s
with a value of $70,567.
 
The July 21 amendment also changed the vesting terms so that 15% of RSUs vested on July 15, 2020, an
additional 15% of RSU units upon FDA approval of a PMA Class III awarded to the Company, an additional 20%
of RSU units on January 1, 2021 and the balance of all unvested RSU units on the earliest date that (a) the
Company achieves $20 million in gross cumulative sales commencing as of January 1, 2020, (b) a Covered
Transaction is consummated or (c) a Trigger Event occurs. Each Grantee has the option to delay the Vesting
Date of all or part of his RSUs until no later than an event described in (b) or (c) above, by serving written
notice to the Company prior to such Vesting Date.
 
The change in vesting terms resulted in a total of 6,795,000 of the RSU’s vesting on July 15, 2020 with
5,070,00 being issued to Mr. Beplate, 1,500,000 being issued to Mr. Schiliro, 75,000 being issued to Mr. Heaton,
75,000 being issued to the oﬃce administrator, who is a person aﬃliated with the Company’s CEO and 75,000
being issued to the Technical Product Supervisor, who is the son of the oﬃce administrator. The change in
vesting terms also resulted in a total of 50,000 of the RSU’s vesting on July 20, 2020 with 50,000 being issued
to the Marketing and Advertising Supervisor, who is the daughter of the oﬃce administrator. The vesting of the
6,845,000 RSU’s resulted in stock-based compensation expense of $4,859,950 which is the fair value of the
stock on the vesting date.
 
In November 2020, the Company granted Mr. Thom 11,500,000 RSU’s which, subject to certain
conditions, shall vest upon the achievement of certain Company objectives and milestones. 
 
In December 2020, the Company entered into a second restricted stock unit agreement with Mr. Heaton.
The second agreement issued an additional 1,000,000 RSU’s, 500,000 of which were granted on the award date
and 500,000 of which will be granted on May 15, 2021 provided his professional services agreement is in eﬀect
on that date. The RSUs, subject to certain conditions, shall vest upon the achievement of certain Company
objectives and milestones. 
 
During the year ended December 31, 2020, the Company issued a total of 125,000 shares of common
stock to Mr. Thom, Chief Executive Oﬃcer, for services rendered.
  
Director Independence
 
Robert Denser is deemed by management to be an independent director of the Company as that term is
deﬁned under Section 10 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended.
 
 
32
 
 
ITEM 14. PRINCIPAL ACCOUNTANT FEES AND SERVICES
 
Haynie & Company were our independent registered accountants during 2019 until their resignation on
December 17, 2019. The following table includes fees billed by them for 2019 in the amount of $50,000. All
other fees are from MAC Accounting Group, LLP.
 
   2020  2019 
          
Audit fees  $50,000  $84,500 
Audit-related fees   -0-   -0- 
Tax fees    -0-   -0- 
All other fees   -0-   -0- 
_________
 
Audit Fees consist of the aggregate fees billed for professional services rendered for the audit of our
annual ﬁnancial statements and the reviews of the ﬁnancial statements included in our Forms 10-Q and for any
other services that were normally provided in connection with our statutory and regulatory ﬁlings or
engagements.
 
Audit Related Fees consist of the aggregate fees billed for professional services rendered for assurance
and related services that were reasonably related to the performance of the audit or review of our ﬁnancial
statements and were not otherwise included in Audit Fees.
 
Tax Fees consist of the aggregate fees billed for professional services rendered for tax compliance, tax
advice and tax planning. Included in such Tax Fees are fees for preparation of our tax returns and consultancy
and advice on other tax planning matters.
 
All Other Fees consist of the aggregate fees billed for products and services provided and not otherwise
included in Audit Fees, Audit Related Fees or Tax Fees. Included in such Other Fees are fees for services
rendered in connection with any private and public oﬀerings conducted during such periods.
  
Audit Committee Pre-Approval Policy
 
The Company does not have an audit committee. Audit committee functions are conducted by the Board
of Directors. We understand the need for the accounting ﬁrm to maintain objectivity and independence in its
audit of our ﬁnancial statements. To minimize relationships that could appear to impair their objectivity, our
Board has restricted the non-audit services that they may provide to us.
 
 
33
 
  
ITEM 15. EXHIBITS, FINANCIAL STATEMENT SCHEDULES
 
(1)Financial Statements
 
The ﬁnancial statements of United Health Products, Inc., supplemental information and report of
independent registered public accounting ﬁrm are included in this Form 10-K.
 
(2)Financial Statement Schedules
 
Schedules have been omitted because of the absence of conditions under which they are required or
because the required information is included in the ﬁnancial statements or notes thereto.
 
(3)Exhibits
 
 (a)Exhibits
 
The following exhibits are ﬁled with this report, or incorporated by reference as noted:
  
3(i)  Articles of Incorporation of the Company dated February 28, 1997. (1)
     
3(ii)  Amendment to Articles of Incorporation. (1)
     
3(iii)  By-laws of the Company. (2)
     
3(iv)  August 2015 Amendment to Articles of Incorporation. (3)
     
10.1  Services Agreement with Louis Schiliro (5)
     
10.2  Services Agreement – Nate Knight (4)
    
10.3  January 2015 Services Agreement with Douglas Beplate (6)
    
10.4  Restricted Stock Unit Agreement – Louis Schiliro (7)
    
10.5  Restricted Stock Unit Agreement – Doug Beplate (7)
    
10.6  Services Agreement with Brian Thom (8)
    
10.7  Restricted Stock Unit Agreement - Brian Thom (8)
    
10.8  Services Agreement with Kristofer Heaton (9)
     
10.9  Restricted Stock Unit Agreement - Kristofer Heaton (9)
     
21  Subsidiaries of the Registrant – none
     
31.1  Certiﬁcation of Principal Executive Oﬃcer*
     
31.2  Certiﬁcation of Principal Financial Oﬃcer*
     
32.1  Section 1350 Certiﬁcate by Principal Executive Oﬃcer*
     
32.2  Section 1350 Certiﬁcate by Principal Financial Oﬃcer*
     
99.1  2019 Employee Beneﬁt and Consulting Services Compensation Plan (10)
 
 
34
 
  
101.SCH Document, XBRL Taxonomy Extension (*)
    
101.CAL Calculation Linkbase, XBRL Taxonomy Extension Deﬁnition (*)
    
101.DEF Linkbase, XBRL Taxonomy Extension Labels (*)
    
101.LAB Linkbase, XBRL Taxonomy Extension (*)
    
101.PRE Presentation Linkbase (*)
___________
* Filed herewith.
 
(1)Incorporated by reference to the Company’s Form 10-Q for the quarter ended September 30, 2014.
  
(2)Incorporated by reference to the Company’s Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2005.
  
(3)Incorporated by reference to Form 8-K dated August 7, 2015 – date of earliest event ﬁled on August 10,
2015.
  
(4)Incorporated by reference to Form 8-K dated November 23, 2014.
  
(5)Incorporated by reference to the Company’s Form 10-Q for the quarter ended June 30, 2018.
  
(6)Incorporated by reference to the Form 8-K dated January 16, 2015.
  
(7)Incorporated by reference to the Company’s Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2018.
  
(8)Incorporated by reference to the Form 8-K dated December 2, 2020
  
(9)Incorporated by reference to the Form 8-K dated January 11, 2021
  
(10)Incorporated by reference to Form S-8 dated October 31, 2019
   
 
35
 
 
SIGNATURES
 
Pursuant to the requirements Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant
has caused this Report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, thereunto duly authorized.
 
  UNITED HEALTH PRODUCTS, INC.  
      
Dated: March 30, 2021 By:/s/ Brian Thom  
   Brian Thom  
   Chief Executive Oﬃcer, Principal
Executive Oﬃcer and Director 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, this Report has been signed below
by the following persons on behalf of the Registrant and in the capacities and on the dates indicated:
 
Signatures  Title   Date
        
By:/s/ Douglas Beplate  Chairman of the Board  March 30, 2021
 Douglas Beplate      
        
By:/s/ Brian Thom  Chief Executive Oﬃcer, Principal  March 30, 2021
 Brian Thom  Executive Oﬃcer and Director   
        
By:/s/ Kristofer Heaton  Principal Financial Oﬃcer  March 30, 2021
 Kristofer Heaton      
        
By:/s/ Louis Schiliro  Director  March 30, 2021
 Louis Schiliro      
        
By:/s/ Robert Denser  Director  March 30, 2021
 Robert Denser      
 
36
